Introduction:
Your privacy is important to us. This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use, and protect your information while you use our apps and services. We are committed to ensuring transparency and compliance with applicable privacy regulations.
Data Usage and Analytics:
We use analytics tools solely to improve your app experience. These tools help us identify and fix critical bugs or crashes before they are reported by users.
Local Data Storage:
Some apps store information locally on your device. This data is only accessible within the application and is not transmitted externally. Developers have absolutely no access to this local data.
Search and Input Features:
Certain search features within our apps allow users to input information in plain text or through a map interface. Most of these features perform calculations locally on your device without transmitting any data externally. For example, conversions like Latitude and Longitude to formats such as MGRS or UTM are processed entirely on your device.
Location Features:
The current location feature is provided solely for user convenience. Developers have no access to your location data.
However, some app features may require input to be sent to third-party servers for additional calculations. While we do not store this data, these third-party providers may collect it under their privacy policies.
Google Elevation API:
Apps like Elevation, HeightMap, and ThaiElevation use Google Elevation API, which is governed by
Google’s Terms of Service
and
Google Privacy Policy
.
Plain Text Search:
Searches (e.g., address, city, or country) use Google API, also governed by
Google’s Terms of Service
and
Google Privacy Policy
.
CoreLocation (Apple):
Location-based features use Apple’s CoreLocation API, which is subject to
Apple’s Privacy Policy
.
What3Words Search:
Supported search features integrate with What3Words, which is governed by
What3Words's Terms & Conditions
and
What3Words's Privacy Policy
.
Advertising:
We use third-party advertisements to support our applications. Advertisers may use cookies and web beacons to collect information such as your IP address, ISP, and device model. This data is generally used for purposes like geotargeting (e.g., showing real estate ads in New York to users in New York) or displaying ads based on browsing habits.
Advertisers such as Google (via AdSense and AdMob) may collect this information under their respective privacy policies.
Ads Consent:
In compliance with privacy regulations such as GDPR, we ask for your consent before displaying personalized ads. Non-personalized ads, which do not use your data for targeting, are shown by default if consent is not provided. Users can manage their ad preferences through the app’s settings or as prompted during app usage.
Crash Reporting:
To enhance app stability, we use third-party crash reporting tools. These providers may collect anonymous crash log information, including your IP address, ISP, and device model.
Specific Apps:
Elevation:
This version uses our own server to store the Elevation database with data provided by JAXA. Coordinates must be submitted to our server to retrieve elevation data. However, we do not collect or store these coordinates. This app uses Google Elevation API which is bounded by
Google’s Terms of Service
and
Google Privacy Policy
.
Plain text search (ex. Address, city, or country name) does use
Google API which is bounded by
Google’s Terms of Service
and
Google Privacy Policy
.
CoreLocation feature by Apple, which is bounded by
Apple’s Privacy Policy
App with search feature may also support What3Words search, which is bounded by
What3Words's Terms & Conditions
and
What3Words's Privacy Policy
GDPR Compliance (For EU Users):
To comply with GDPR regulations, EU users will receive non-personalized ads provided by approved Google Ads partners, such as:
Google
https://www.google.com/policies/technologies/partner-sites/
Aarki
http://corp.aarki.com/privacy
Adacado
https://www.adacado.com/privacy-policy-april-25-2018/
Adara Media
https://adara.com/2018/04/10/adara-gdpr-faq/
AdClear
https://www.adclear.de/datenschutzerklaerung/
ADEX
http://theadex.com
Adform
https://site.adform.com/uncategorized/product-and-services-privacy-policy/
Adikteev
https://www.adikteev.com/eu/privacy/
AdLedge
https://adledge.com/data-privacy/
Adloox
http://adloox.com/disclaimer
For more information, please review the privacy policies of these partners.
Agreement:
By using our apps, you automatically agree to the Privacy Policy and Terms of Service outlined on this website. If you do not agree, please uninstall the app immediately.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Sub-policy 1
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Privacy
Local Nav Open Menu
Local Nav Close Menu
Overview
Features
Control
Labels
Transparency Report
Privacy Policy
English
Choose your preferred language
At Apple, we believe strongly in fundamental privacy rights — and that those fundamental rights should not differ depending on where you live in the world.
That’s why we treat any data that relates to an identified or identifiable individual or that is linked or linkable to them by Apple as “personal data,” no matter where the individual lives.
This means that data that directly identifies you — such as your name — is personal data, and also data that does not directly identify you, but that can reasonably be used to identify you — such as the serial number of your device — is personal data. Aggregated data is considered non‑personal data for the purposes of this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy covers how
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
(collectively, “Apple”) handles personal data whether you interact with us on our websites, through Apple apps (such as Apple Music or Wallet), or in person (including by phone or when visiting an Apple Store). Apple may also link to third parties on our services or make third-party apps available for download in our App Store. Apple’s Privacy Policy does not apply to how third parties define personal data or how they use it. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
At Apple, we respect your ability to know, access, correct, transfer, restrict the processing of, and delete your personal data. We have provided these rights to our global customer base and if you choose to exercise these privacy rights, you have the right not to be treated in a discriminatory way nor to receive a lesser degree of service from Apple. Where you are requested to consent to the processing of your personal data by Apple, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
To exercise your privacy rights and choices, including where a third-party service provider is acting on Apple’s behalf, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
for Apple or
shazam.com/privacy
for Shazam.
To help protect the security of your personal data, you must sign in to your account and your identity will be verified. If you want to obtain a copy of personal data that is not currently available from
privacy.apple.com
, you can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the applicable regulator.
There may be situations where we cannot grant your request — for example, if you ask us to delete your transaction data and Apple is legally obligated to keep a record of that transaction to comply with law. We may also decline to grant a request where doing so would undermine our legitimate use of data for anti-fraud and security purposes, such as when you request deletion of an account that is being investigated for security concerns. Other reasons your privacy request may be denied are if it jeopardizes the privacy of others, is frivolous or vexatious, or would be extremely impractical or unreasonable.
If you live in California and you cannot access Apple’s Data and Privacy page,
you or your authorized agent can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or by calling 1-800-275-2273.
For more information on exercising your rights, visit
support.apple.com/102283
.
At Apple, we believe that you can have great products and great privacy. This means that we strive to
collect only the personal data that we need
. The personal data Apple collects depends on how you interact with Apple. Descriptions of how Apple handles personal data for certain individual services are available at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
When you create an Apple Account, apply for commercial credit, purchase and/or activate a product or device, download a software update, register for a class at an Apple Store, connect to our services, contact us (including by social media), participate in an online survey, or otherwise interact with Apple, we may collect a variety of information, including:
Account Information.
Your Apple Account and related account details, including email address, devices registered, account status, and age
Device Information.
Data from which your device could be identified, such as device serial number, or about your device, such as browser type
Contact Information
. Data such as name, email address, physical address, phone number, or other contact information
Payment Information. Data about your billing address and method of payment, such as bank details, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Transaction Information.
Data about purchases of Apple products and services or transactions facilitated by Apple, including purchases on Apple platforms
Fraud Prevention Information.
Data used to help identify and prevent fraud, including a device trust score
Usage Data.
Data about your activity on and use of our offerings, such as app launches within our services, including browsing history; search history; product interaction; crash data, performance and other diagnostic data; and other usage data
Location Information
. Precise location only to support services such as Find My or where you agree for region-specific services, and coarse location
Health Information.
Data relating to the health status of an individual, including data related to one’s physical or mental health or condition. Personal health data also includes data that can be used to make inferences about or detect the health status of an individual. If you participate in a study using an Apple Health Research Study app, the policy governing the privacy of your personal data is described in the
Apple Health Study Apps Privacy Policy
.
Fitness Information.
Details relating to your fitness and exercise information where you choose to share them
Financial Information.
Details including salary, income, and assets information where collected, and information related to Apple-branded financial offerings
Government ID Data.
In certain jurisdictions, we may ask for a government-issued ID in limited circumstances, including when setting up a wireless account and activating your device, for the purpose of extending commercial credit, managing reservations, or as required by law
Other Information You Provide to Us.
Details such as the content of your communications with Apple, including interactions with customer support and contacts through social media channels
You are not required to provide the personal data that we have requested. However, if you choose not to do so, in many cases we will not be able to provide you with our products or services or respond to requests you may have.
Apple may receive personal data about you from other
individuals
, from businesses or third parties acting
at your direction
, from our
partners
who work with us to provide our products and services and assist us in security and fraud prevention, and from other
lawful sources.
Individuals.
Apple may collect data about you from other individuals — for example, if that individual has sent you a product or gift card, invited you to participate in an Apple service or forum, or shared content with you.
At Your Direction.
You may direct other individuals or third parties to share data with Apple. For example, you may direct your mobile carrier to share data about your carrier account with Apple for account activation, or for your loyalty program to share information about your participation so that you can earn rewards for Apple purchases.
Apple Partners.
We may also validate the information you provide — for example, when creating an Apple Account, with a third party for security, and for fraud-prevention purposes.
To power features such as search and as a source for our foundational AI models, Apple uses Applebot, a web crawler, to crawl information that is publicly available on the internet. We have measures in place to reduce the amount of personal data we collect and make no attempt to connect data crawled to any individual Apple user, or to build profiles about individuals. Your private personal data is not used to train our foundational AI models. To exercise your right as an individual to opt out of processing, visit the
Apple Intelligence Privacy Inquiries form
. For more information about Applebot, visit
support.apple.com/120320
.
For research and development purposes, we may use datasets such as those that contain images, voices, or other data that could be associated with an identifiable person. When acquiring such datasets, we do so in accordance with applicable law, including law in the jurisdiction in which the dataset is hosted. When using such datasets for research and development, we do not attempt to reidentify individuals who may appear therein.
Apple uses personal data to power our services, to process your transactions, to communicate with you, for security and fraud prevention, and to comply with law. We may also use personal data for other purposes with your consent.
Apple uses your personal data only when we have a valid legal basis to do so.
Depending on the circumstance, Apple may rely on your consent or the fact that the processing is necessary to fulfill a contract with you, protect your vital interests or those of other persons, or to comply with law. We may also process your personal data where we believe it is in our or others’ legitimate interests, taking into consideration your interests, rights, and expectations. More information is available in the product-specific information embedded in our products and features as described above. If you have questions about the legal basis, you can contact the Data Protection Officer at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Power Our Services.
Apple collects personal data necessary to power our services, which may include personal data collected to improve our offerings, for internal purposes such as auditing or data analysis, or for troubleshooting. For example, if you would like to access a song through an Apple Music subscription, we collect data on what songs you play in order to provide you with the content requested and for royalty purposes.
Process Your Transactions.
To process transactions, Apple must collect data such as your name, purchase, and payment information.
Communicate with You.
To respond to communications, reach out to you about your transactions or account, market our products and services, provide other relevant information, or request information or feedback. From time to time, we may use your personal data to send important notices, such as communications about purchases and changes to our terms, conditions, and policies. Because this information is important to your interaction with Apple, you may not opt out of receiving these important notices.
Security and Fraud Prevention.
To protect individuals, employees, and Apple and for loss prevention and to prevent fraud, including to protect individuals, employees, and Apple for the benefit of all our users, and prescreening or scanning uploaded content for potentially illegal content, including child sexual exploitation material.
Personal Data Used for Personalization.
If you choose to personalize your services or communications where such options are available, Apple will use information that we collect so that we can offer you those personalized services or communications. You can learn more about how relevant services use information to personalize your experience by reviewing the privacy information presented when you first use a service that asks to use your personal data. We make this information easy to find by presenting it with our Data & Privacy icon; it’s also available at all times on your Apple device and online at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
Comply with Law.
To comply with applicable law — for example, to satisfy tax or reporting obligations, or to comply with a lawful governmental request.
Apple does not use algorithms or profiling to make any decision that would significantly affect you without the opportunity for human review. Apple also does not use or disclose sensitive personal data for any purposes that would require a user to exercise a right to limit processing according to California law.
Apple retains personal data only for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, including as described in this Privacy Policy or in our service-specific privacy notices, or as required by law. We will retain your personal data for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy and our service-specific privacy notices. When assessing retention periods, we first carefully examine whether it is necessary to retain the personal data collected and, if retention is required, work to retain the personal data for the shortest possible period permissible under law.
Apple may share personal data with
Apple-affiliated companies
,
service providers
who act on our behalf, our
partners
,
developers, and publishers
, or others
at your direction
. Further, Apple does not share personal data with third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Service Providers.
Apple may engage third parties to act as our service providers and perform certain tasks on our behalf, such as processing or storing data, including personal data, in connection with your use of our services and delivering products to customers. Apple service providers are obligated to handle personal data consistent with this Privacy Policy and according to our instructions. They cannot use the personal data we share for their own purposes and must delete or return the personal data once they’ve fulfilled our request.
Partners.
At times, Apple may partner with third parties to provide services or other offerings. For example, Apple financial offerings like Apple Card and Apple Cash are offered by Apple and our partners. Apple requires its partners to protect your personal data.
Developers and Publishers from Whom You Get a Subscription.
If you purchase a third-party subscription from the App Store or within Apple News, we create a Subscriber ID that is unique to you and the developer or publisher. The Subscriber ID may be used to provide reports to the developer or publisher, which include information about the subscription you purchased and your country of residence. If you cancel all of your subscriptions from a particular developer or publisher, the Subscriber ID will reset after 180 days if you do not resubscribe. This information is provided to developers or publishers so that they can understand the performance of their subscriptions.
Others.
Apple may share personal data with others at your direction or with your consent, such as when we share information with your carrier to activate your account. We may also disclose information about you if we determine that for purposes of national security, law enforcement, or other issues of public importance, disclosure is necessary or appropriate. We may also disclose information about you where there is a lawful basis for doing so, if we determine that disclosure is reasonably necessary to enforce our terms and conditions or to protect our operations or users, or in the event of a reorganization, merger, or sale.
Apple does not sell your personal data including as “sale” is defined in Nevada and California. Apple also does not “share” your personal data as that term is defined in California.
At Apple, we believe that great privacy rests on great security. We use
administrative, technical, and physical safeguards
to protect your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the processing, and the threats posed. We are constantly working to improve on these safeguards to help keep your personal data secure. For more information, visit our
Apple Platform Security
guide.
Apple understands the importance of safeguarding the personal data of children, which we consider to be an
individual under the age of 13 or the equivalent age as specified by law in your jurisdiction
. That is why Apple has implemented additional processes and protections to help keep children’s personal data safe.
To access certain Apple services, a child must have a child Apple Account. A child Apple Account may be created by the
parent
or, in the case of a Managed Apple Account, by the
child’s educational institution
.
Parents.
To create a child account, parents must review the
Family Privacy Disclosure for Children
, which describes how Apple handles children’s personal data. If they agree, the parent must provide Apple with a verifiable parental consent.
Educational Institutions.
Educational institutions that participate in the Apple School Manager Program may also create Apple IDs for students, called “Managed Apple IDs.” These schools are required to agree to the
Managed Apple IDs for Students Disclosure
which is included as Exhibit A to the Apple School Manager Agreement.
If we learn that a child’s personal data was collected without appropriate authorization, it will be deleted as soon as possible.
To exercise privacy rights for your child’s information, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
and sign in to their account.
Apple’s websites, online services, interactive applications, and advertisements may use
“cookies” and other technologies
such as web beacons.
These technologies help us to better understand user behavior including for security and fraud prevention purposes, tell us which parts of our websites people have visited, and facilitate and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches.
Communications Cookies.
These cookies are used to enable network traffic to and from Apple’s systems, including by helping us detect any errors.
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
These cookies are set as required to provide a specific feature or service that you have accessed or requested. For example, they allow us to display our websites in the proper format and language, to authenticate and verify your transactions, and to preserve the contents of your Bag when shopping online at
apple.com
.
Other Cookies.
These cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with our websites and online services, including by helping us to assess the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches. Apple also uses these cookies to remember choices you make while browsing, so we can provide you with a customized experience.
If you prefer that Apple not use cookies, we provide you with the means to disable their use. If you want to disable cookies and you’re using the Safari web browser, choose “Block all cookies” in Safari’s privacy settings. If you are using a different browser, check with your provider to find out how to disable cookies. Certain features of the Apple website may not be available if all cookies are disabled.
In addition to cookies, Apple uses other technologies that help us achieve similar objectives.
In some email messages Apple sends to you, we provide a “click-through URL” that links you to content on the Apple website. When you click one of these URLs, they pass through a separate server before arriving at the destination page on our website. We track this click-through to help us determine interest in particular topics and measure whether we are communicating with you effectively. If you prefer not to be tracked in this way, you should not click graphic or text links in email messages.
Apple generally treats data we collect using these cookies and similar technologies as non-personal data.
However, to the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or similar identifiers are considered personal data by local law, we also treat these identifiers as personal data in those regions. In addition, Apple sometimes combines non-personal data collected from these technologies with other personal data Apple holds. When we combine data in this way, we treat the combined data as personal data for purposes of this Privacy Policy.
Ads that are delivered by Apple’s advertising platform may appear on the App Store, Apple News, Stocks, and Apple TV app depending on your location. Apple’s advertising platform does not track you, meaning that it does not link user or device data collected from our apps with user or device data collected from third parties for targeted advertising or advertising measurement purposes, and does not share user or device data with data brokers.
If you do not want to receive ads targeted to your interests from Apple's advertising platform in those apps, you can choose to disable Personalized Ads, which will opt your Apple Account out of receiving such ads regardless of what device you are using. On your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to Settings > Privacy & Security > Apple Advertising and tapping to turn off Personalized Ads. On your Mac, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to System Settings > Privacy & Security > Privacy > Advertising, then deselecting Personalized Ads. You may still see ads in the App Store, Apple News, or Stocks based on context like your search query or the channel you are reading. If you disable Allow Apps to Request to Track, third-party apps cannot request to use the Advertising Identifier, a non-personal identifier served by the operating system on your device, to track you across apps and websites owned by other companies.
For more information about Apple-delivered advertising and privacy, visit
apple.com/legal/privacy/data/ww/apple-advertising
.
Apple products and offerings connect you to the world. To make that possible,
your personal data may be transferred to or accessed by entities around the world,
including Apple-affiliated companies, to perform processing activities such as those described in this Privacy Policy in connection with your use of our products and services. Apple complies with laws on the transfer of personal data between countries to help ensure your data is protected, wherever it may be.
The Apple entity that controls your personal data may differ depending on where you live.
For example, Apple Store information is controlled by individual retail entities in each country and Apple Media Services-related personal data may be controlled by various Apple entities as reflected in the terms of service. If you do not reside in the U.S., your personal data may be processed by Apple Inc. and other Apple-affiliated companies on behalf of the Apple entity controlling personal data for your jurisdiction. For example, Imagery and associated data collected by Apple around the world to improve Apple Maps and to support our Look Around feature is transferred to Apple Inc. in California.
Personal data relating to individuals in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is controlled by Apple Distribution International Limited in Ireland. Apple’s international transfer of personal data collected in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is governed by
Standard Contractual Clauses
. If you have questions or would like a copy of Apple’s Standard Contractual Clauses, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Personal data collected by
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
worldwide is generally stored by Apple Inc. in the United States. Regardless of where your personal data is stored, Apple maintains the same high level of protection and safeguarding measures.
Apple’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Global Cross-Border Privacy Rules (CBPRs) System and the Global Privacy Recognition for Processors (PRP) System. For more information about the Global CBPR and PRP Systems, visit
Global CBPR Forum
. To view our certifications, visit
CBPR System Compliance Directory
. For more information about the scope of our participation, or to submit a privacy inquiry through
BBB National Programs
, our Accountability Agent, visit:
Cross-Border Privacy Rules Program
Privacy Recognition for Processors Program
Personal data relating to individuals in the People’s Republic of China may be processed by Apple in countries outside of the People’s Republic of China, such as Apple Inc. in the United States or Apple Distribution International Limited in the Republic of Ireland. Where this occurs, it will be done in compliance with local laws, including the Personal Information Protection Law. For the purposes of processing set out in this Privacy Policy, Apple may also transfer such personal data to third-party service providers, who may in turn store or transfer the data outside of the People’s Republic of China. For more information, visit
China Mainland Privacy Disclosures
.
To make sure your personal data is secure, we communicate our privacy and security guidelines to Apple employees and strictly enforce privacy safeguards within the company.
If you have questions about Apple’s Privacy Policy or privacy practices including where a third-party service provider is acting on our behalf, or you would like to contact our Data Protection Officer, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or call the
Apple Support number
for your country or region.
You can also ask us questions about how to submit a privacy complaint and we will endeavor to help.
Apple takes your privacy questions seriously. A dedicated team reviews your inquiry to determine how best to respond to your question or concern, including those inquiries received in response to an access or download request. In most cases, all substantive contacts receive a response within seven days. In other cases, we may require additional information or let you know that we need more time to respond.
Where your complaint indicates an improvement could be made in our handling of privacy issues, we will take steps to make such an update at the next reasonable opportunity. In the event that a privacy issue has resulted in a negative impact on you or another person, we will take steps to address that with you or that other person.
You may at any time — including if you are not satisfied with Apple’s response — refer your complaint to the applicable regulator. If you ask us, we will endeavor to provide you with information about relevant complaint avenues which may be applicable to your circumstances.
When there is a material change to this Privacy Policy, we’ll post a notice on this website at least a week in advance of doing so and contact you directly about the change if we have your data on file.
View our CBPR certification
View our PRP certification
Sub-policy 2
https://what3words.com/privacy/:
AR
|
DE
|
FR
|
EN
|
ES
|
JP
|
KO
|
MN
|
RU
|
SR
|
VI
|
ZH
what3words Privacy Policy
(last updated in June 2023)
In respect of the Processing activities described in this privacy policy (the “
Policy
”),
what3words Limited
, a company with its registered address at Studio 301 Great Western Studios, 65 Alfred Rd, London, England, W2 5EU, UK (“
what3words
”, “
we
” or “
us
”) is the Controller, unless stated otherwise.
This Policy is addressed to individuals outside of our organisation with whom we interact, including visitors to our Website, users of our Apps, our business customers and other users of our services (together, “
you
”). This Policy details the Personal Data we collect in relation to you and explains how we handle that Personal Data. Defined terms used in this Policy are explained in section 9 below.
We are committed to protecting your Personal Data. We really do welcome any questions, comments and requests you may have regarding this Policy. You can contact us by emailing us at
dataprotection@what3words.com
.
This Policy contains much more detail, but we wanted to make you aware of the following points:
We receive data – that can constitute Personal Data under applicable laws – in order to provide our
online services
. However, we do not receive any data from usage of our app created for
emergency services
(what3words Lite).
We cannot (and would not) track your movements – we only receive data on squares you open/click on or 3 word addresses that you search for when using our services (so that we can give you the relevant 3 word address or location).
We also use data to analyse our customer and visitor behaviour
as a whole
(and never on an individual level). Like most online service providers, we do this so that we can improve our users’ experience on our website and apps and improve our services.
We
do not share any data with third parties
in order for
them to advertise their products/services to you.
We conduct
digital advertising campaigns ourselves
on other websites, such as social media websites to increase awareness of what3words. Our
Cookies Policy
has more information on how you can opt out of interest-based advertising on those websites if you wish.
We will only send our
newsletters
to you with your
consent
and you can opt out at any time.
We
do not sell your personal information
(for the intents and purposes of the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)).
1. What data do we collect or create, what do we use it for and what is our legal basis?
In this section, with respect to each of our products, services or specific features of our products or services, we describe what Personal Data we collect or create, the purposes for which we use this data and the legal basis of the relevant Processing activity.
(A) Our products designed for emergency services
If you are a user of our product created for emergency services (what3words Lite), we do not collect any Personal Data about you: for more information, please see the relevant privacy policy
here
.
We offer another service for emergency services (and other organisations) called “FindMe”. Emergency services (or other organisations) may send you a “FindMe” link, which is designed so that you can tell them your 3 word address location. If you open a “FindMe” link sent to you, we collect the following Personal Data about you:
IP address; and
the 3 word address locations you searched or landed on.
Processing of this data is technically required for us to provide this service. We have a
legitimate interest
in carrying out this Processing for the purpose of providing the “FindMe” service.
(B) Our Website and Apps
If you visit the Website or use the Apps, we may collect the following Personal Data about you:
the 3 word address locations you searched or landed on (including anything you type incorrectly into the search bar);
if you search for a 3 word address using the voice function, an audio file is transcribed to text through automated methods by software provided by our partner,
Cerence
, after which the audio file is instantly deleted. We receive a text file of the 3 words you said, provided that it is or sounds like a combination of 3 words from our word list;
your IP address;
your device ID;
the type of browser, device and operating system that you are using (e.g. Chrome browser, Samsung device and Android operating system);
referrer information (which website you visited from e.g. a search engine);
time zone;
user preferences (e.g. language);
which pages you visited/actions you carried out on the Website and Apps and the relevant dates and times;
aggregate statistical information relating to how you and others interact with the Website and Apps;
if you choose to use the photo feature in the Apps, the 3 word address at which a photo was taken (but not the photo itself) and the fact that the “share” button has been pressed (if applicable);
if you choose to download materials available on our Website, such as the what3words toolkits or what3words learning activities, your name, email address and any other information requested by the relevant sign-up form that you choose to give us; and
if you contact us to ask us a question, to report an issue or for any other reason (e.g. using our
Intercom
messaging platform), your name, contact details and your communication to us.
The purposes for which we collect this data are:
to provide the service you are expecting (the conversion of 3 word address to coordinates or vice versa);
(for the voice search function only) to permit audio to text transcription through automated methods;
to ensure that content from our Website or Apps is presented in the most effective manner for you and for your device;
to improve the services we provide in the short term, for example by providing you with more relevant search results;
to improve the services we provide over the longer-term by understanding how you and other users interact with our services. We analyse our customer and visitor behaviour as a whole and never on an individual level – this means we produce aggregated figures to measure the performance of our services;
to serve recommendations to you around those functionalities of the Website or Apps which are most relevant to you, based on your use of those platforms;
to notify you about any important changes to our services;
to send you materials which you are choosing to download from the Website;
to respond to your queries, resolve reports of any issues and/or disputes, and operational performance improvement; and
to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations under applicable law and to establish, exercise and defend our legal rights.
We consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in Processing the Personal Data we collect through our Website and Apps in order to deliver the service you are expecting. We also have a
legitimate interest
in Processing the Personal Data to analyse and better understand how each service is being used. Where Personal Data is collected through our usage of analytical cookies, we obtain your prior
consent
to the Processing (which you may withdraw at any time) – please see section D below. We also Process Personal Data where necessary for
compliance with legal obligations
.
(C) what3words Accounts and Saved Locations
If you choose to register for an account on our Website or Apps, we may collect the following Personal Data about you:
your name;
your email address or, if you choose to use these to sign in, your third party credentials (e.g. your Google, Apple or Facebook ID);
your country; and
your chosen what3words account password.
Please note that you must be of a certain minimum age to become a what3words account holder, as stated in our
Terms and Conditions
.
You are not required to provide us with any of this information to use the Website or the Apps, but you need to be a registered account holder to use certain functionalities such as “Saved Locations”. The “Saved Locations” functionality enables users in some jurisdictions to save specific 3 word addresses and label them (e.g. “home” or “work”) and we store these (together with your account information) so that you can access them whenever you log in. You can also choose to delete your “Saved Locations” at any time within your account or to delete your account completely.
As you can choose your own text for “Saved Locations” labels, we have the following rules in our
Terms and Conditions
: please do not save any personal data about other people in your labels (such as names of other people) or any sensitive personal data such as health information. Whilst this would be a breach of our terms, it is possible that someone else may have included personal data relating to you in one of that person’s labels: for example, if one of your friends saves a location with your name as a label. You can mitigate against this by asking friends/family to respect our terms and to not save locations with information relating to you. In addition, you can also exercise your rights as further specified in section 6 below.
If you are inputting someone’s email address in order to enable them to access a link to a list of “Saved Locations” that you have created, please ensure you have permission from the intended recipient to use their email address in this way. These email addresses are encrypted and stored on our systems solely for the purposes of authenticating the recipient; if the recipient does not open the link, the email address is deleted from our systems within 7 days.
If your device settings are opted-in to receive push notifications, you may receive notifications relating to marketing, promotions and product features such as saved locations. For example, if someone invites you to follow a list or if someone updates a list that you are following. You can manage your push notification preferences or deactivate these notifications at any time in your device settings.
We analyse aggregated data (i.e. relating to all users, and never any individual user) regarding “Saved Locations” in order to improve the services we provide over the longer-term (e.g. how many people are saving “home” as a label, which languages are people using in their labels etc).
We consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in analysing the relevant Personal Data that you give us as a what3words account holder to better understand how our service is being used and to improve the quality and provision of our services.  Our legal basis for the other Processing of the Personal Data mentioned above is it is necessary for the
performance of the contract
we have entered into with you (our
Terms and Conditions
).
(D) Cookies
We may utilise cookies and similar technologies to distinguish you from other users: in particular, so that we can deliver a seamless experience between our Apps and our Website and so that we can analyse aggregated usage data (e.g. how many people are returning to our Website more than once). In addition, we may use cookies to allow us to measure the success of our digital advertising campaigns and to build audiences for our advertising campaigns on social media sites.
For these purposes, we may collect the following Personal Data about you: records of our advertising and content shown on pages or screens displayed to you and records of any interaction you may have had with such content or advertising.
For further detail on specific cookies, please see our
Cookies Policy
. We utilise these Cookies where we have obtained your prior
consent
to the Processing (which you may withdraw at any time), other than for essential cookies where we consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in using these cookies in order to provide you with our services.
(E) Newsletters
If you sign up to our email newsletter (you can subscribe
here
), we may collect the following Personal Data about you:
your name; and
your email address and/or other contact details.
We only send out our newsletters where we have your
consent
and you can opt out to receiving such communications at any time by hitting the unsubscribe link at the bottom of any email communication, or by emailing us at
dataprotection@what3words.com
.
We may use pixel tags within our emails to enable us to compile aggregate statistics (e.g. how many people are opening newsletter emails) in order to measure the success of email campaigns. We consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in collecting analytics information in relation to interactions with our emails in order to ensure that we continue to provide relevant information to recipients.
(F) w3w.community and Beta Testers
If you have a what3words account, you can choose to join our global community of supporters,
w3w.community
. You can also join the what3words Beta Testing programme
here
, so that we can contact you to review what3words products. In each case, we may collect the following Personal Data about you:
your name;
your email address and/or other contact details;
any other information that a sign-up form asks for and/or that you choose to give us;
user content including text, images, videos and other content that you choose to share on/post to our w3w.community forum or that you otherwise provide to us; and
data relating to your interactions with w3w.community (e.g. the popularity of your posts).
Please bear in mind that user content that you post may be visible to anyone on the internet.
The Processing of your Personal Data is necessary for the
performance of the contract
we have entered into with you (
here
for w3w.community and
here
for Beta Testers). We also Process user content to understand how you and other users interact with our services and and we consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in doing so to improve the services we provide over the longer-term.
For members of w3w.community, we may Process your Personal Data to personalise your content/experience on the community forum, to enable us to reward you for community activity (e.g. with virtual points, subject to our
terms and conditions
), and to allow us to deliver the type of content and marketing materials (if you have provided your consent to receiving marketing materials) that we think you will be most interested in. We consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in this Processing so that we can improve your experience of w3w.community.
(G) The what3words API
If you sign up for the what3words application programming interface
available
here
(the “
API
”), we may collect the following Personal Data:
your name;
your email address and/or other contact details;
your chosen account password;
data that relates to your professional activities (e.g. your job title and industry);
your payment details, which are collected and stored on our behalf by our payment provider,
Stripe
;
the content of each API call (e.g. the 3word address searched) and timestamp of the call;
the API key (the unique identifier used to authenticate the user/program making a call to the API);
the IP address from which the API call was made; and
if you use the voice API, an audio file is transcribed to text through automated methods by software provided by our partner,
Speechmatics
,
after which the audio file is instantly deleted. We receive a text file of the 3 words you said, provided that it is or sounds like a combination of 3 words from our word list.
Please note that we do not collect the content of any API call or the IP address from which the API call was made for our emergency services users.
The purposes for which we use this data are to provide the service you are expecting (the conversion of 3 word address to coordinates or vice versa), to take payment for the service, to analyse and better understand how the service is being used and to provide you with a more relevant experience if we contact you (e.g. for feedback). We may contact you from time to time to inform you about updates to the API or similar service-related information.
Processing the Personal Data to provide our service and to take payment for it is necessary for the
performance of the contract
we have entered into with you (
here
). With respect to analysing the use of the API, we consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in doing so to better understand how the API is being used and improve our service.
(H) Our Enterprise Suite
We license out our
enterprise suite
to our partners which allows them to convert 3 word addresses to coordinates (or vice versa) in their own products and applications. The technology is hosted on partners’ own servers and we do not receive Personal Data from this usage.
(I) Business to business marketing and our business customers/partners
As a prospective or existing business customer/partner of what3words, we may collect the following Personal Data about you:
your name, email address and telephone number;
data that relates to your professional activities (e.g. your job title and industry);
the name and address of the business you own or represent; and
content that you post on other websites (e.g. social media websites).
For prospective business customers/partners, we may collect this information directly from you or from publicly available sources such as LinkedIn and, subject to any local law restrictions, we may use this information to contact you directly for the purpose of informing you about our products and services and discussing any potential partnership. Should you not wish to be contacted by us after we have reached out to you, please do not hesitate to let us know. For existing business customers/partners, we use this information for business administration purposes, including fulfilling our obligations under contracts.
With respect to prospective business customers/partners, our legal basis for this Processing is either your
consent
if required by local laws, or otherwise our
legitimate interest
in introducing business customers/partners to our products and services and then maintaining a business relationship. With respect to existing business customers/partners, the relevant Processing of Personal Data may also be necessary for the
performance of the contract
we have entered into with you.
(J) Expanding what3words
From time to time, we may run
surveys
or
competitions
(subject to and in compliance with local law requirements). If you choose to enter, we may collect the following Personal Data about you: your identity data (e.g. name and nationality), your contact details (e.g. email address and phone number), data that relates to your professional activities (e.g. your job title and industry) and the content of the communications to us (e.g. your survey responses, your competition entry). We use this data to obtain your feedback in response to the survey and/or to run the competition and/or to notify you if you are a winner. We will Process your Personal Data for these purposes only where we have obtained your prior
consent
(which you may withdraw at any time).
If you choose to
attend an event
with us, we may capture your image (either by way of photograph or video) for the purpose of promoting our services and/or creating materials/recordings for attendees or other interested parties. Where practically possible we will seek
consent
in advance of an event. Otherwise (and subject to any local law requirements), you may be notified that we will be filming/taking photographs and given the option to opt out. You can always opt out (or withdraw consent) by emailing
dataprotection@what3words.com
. We consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in the filming/photography of events in order to grow our business.
If you contact us to
tell us your story
of using what3words’ services or post about it on other websites (e.g. social media channels), we may collect the following Personal Data about you: your identity data (e.g. name), your contact details (e.g. email address) and the content of the communications to us or your public post (e.g. your story of a rescue using what3words). We collect this to build up a picture of usage of what3words for our internal purposes and consider that we have a
legitimate interest
in doing do. If we contact you and you agree to take part in a
promotional campaign
in which you share your story in digital or print media, we use this data to keep in touch with you and share your story in the form and channels that you agree to. We will Process your Personal Data for this purpose only where we have obtained your prior
consent
(which you may withdraw at any time).
(K) Prospective candidates
If you apply for a role at what3words as a prospective candidate, through the recruitment process we may collect the following Personal Data about you: your contact details, CVs and supplementary information, information gathered through interviews or other assessments, video recordings of interviews (where you agree to send or provide these to us), and references supplied by former employers or agencies.
We Process this Personal Data for the purpose of reviewing applications, contacting and communicating with applicants and carrying out interviews.
If you are successful in your application, any relevant information collected as part of the recruitment process will be transferred to your personnel file and retained during your employment. If your application is unsuccessful, we automatically delete information 18 months following conclusion of the recruitment process. This Processing is necessary for
compliance with legal obligations
(especially in respect of applicable employment law) and is necessary for
taking steps prior into entering into a contract
(an employment agreement) with us. We may also process this Personal Data to protect our interests and enforce our rights and we have a
legitimate interest
in doing so.
2. Disclosure of Personal Data to third parties
We will only disclose your Personal Data to other organisations for the purposes set out in this Policy and in accordance with applicable law. In particular, we will never disclose your contact details to third parties to allow them to contact you for direct marketing purposes.
We may share your Personal Data with the following recipients or categories of recipients:
our affiliates and subsidiaries;
a prospective buyer in the event of a sale or purchase of what3words or any of its assets;
a third party where obligated to do so by law or where necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal rights;
third party service providers, such as accountants, auditors, lawyers and professional advisors;
independent contractors and external consultants engaged by us;
data hosting companies (such as
Amazon Web Services
and
Google Cloud
);
CRM Solution providers (such as
Salesforce
and
Hubspot
);
providers of data analytics services that help us understand how our services are used (such as
Mixpanel
,
Google Firebase
and
Google Analytics
) and measure the success of our digital advertising campaigns (such as
Facebook
);
providers of speech recognition software (for the conversion of audio files to text files through automated methods) if you use our voice search function:
Cerence
(see
Privacy Policy
) for the Apps and
Speechmatics
(see
Privacy Policy
) for the API;
providers of payment services (such as
Stripe
(see
Privacy Policy
) if you enter your payment details for use of our API);
other IT service providers (such as
G Suite for Business
,
Intercom
for communication with visitors to the Website, and
Slack
which we use for internal communications
;
if you use any of our products on Alexa-enabled devices, Amazon may collect Personal Data through your use of its Alexa platform
and Process such data for its own purposes (
Privacy Notice
);
Mapping providers for our Website: Mapbox (see
Privacy Policy
), Google Maps (see
Privacy Policy
), Esri Maps (see
Privacy Policy
), Open Street Maps (see
Privacy Policy
), TomTom (see
Privacy Policy
); and
Mapping provider for our Apps: Google Maps (see
Privacy Policy
).
Where we use Processors to Process your Personal Data, we have entered into data processing terms which meet the requirements of applicable data protection legislation and according to which they only Process your Personal Data upon our instructions.
3. Where we store and transfer your Personal Data
For the purposes of Processing your Personal Data as set out in this Policy, the Personal Data that we collect from you may be transferred to, and stored in, a country outside the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”). It may also be Processed by staff operating outside the EEA who either work for us or for one of the recipients of Personal Data listed in section 2 above. Countries outside the EEA may not have laws which provide the same level of protection to your Personal Data as laws within the EEA. Where this is the case, we will put in place appropriate safeguards to ensure that such transfers comply with applicable data protection laws. For Personal Data of those to whom the GDPR applies, this means that we either transfer the relevant Personal Data to countries that the European Commission has determined provide an adequate level of protection for Personal Data or we enter into the Standard Contractual Clauses (as adopted by the European Commission) with the recipient of the Personal Data.
4. Keeping information secure
We have implemented technical measures and organisational security measures designed to protect your Personal Data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorised disclosure, unauthorised access, and other unlawful or unauthorised forms of Processing, in accordance with applicable law. For example, we provide HTTPS to ensure communication to/from what3words is securely encrypted. Our systems are protected behind a firewalled VPC, all hosted in London on Amazon infrastructure, and we follow strict internal policies as to our handling of personal data and conduct regular reviews of our infrastructure and server security. Unfortunately, the transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure, so any transmission of data is at your own risk, but we use strict procedures and security features to try to prevent unauthorised access.
5. How long we keep your personal data
We will only store your Personal Data for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes we collected it for. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your Personal Data, the purposes for which we Process your Personal Data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, as well as the applicable legal requirements.
6. Your rights
We think it is important that you are able to control your Personal Data. Under applicable data protection laws, you may be entitled to exercise the following rights where we Process Personal Data about you:
the right to access Personal Data that we hold about you, to ask us for copies of your Personal Data and to request information about the related Processing activities;
the right to ask us to rectify Personal Data you think is inaccurate and to require us to complete Personal Data you think is incomplete;
the right to require us to delete your Personal Data in certain circumstances. There will be instances where this right is restricted, such as where it is necessary to continue to Process your Personal Data for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims;
the right to require us to restrict how we Process your Personal Data in certain circumstances (e.g. if you dispute its accuracy, we may restrict its Processing until your complaint is resolved);
the right to require us to transfer your Personal Data to another organisation, or to you, in certain circumstances; or
where we Process your Personal Data on the basis of consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. We will make this a simple and easy process for you (e.g. through ‘unsubscribe’ links in our marketing communications). Please note that this will not affect the lawfulness of Processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
Where we Process your Personal Data on the basis of legitimate interest, you have the right to object such Processing at any time in certain circumstances. There will be instances where this right is restricted, such as where we have an overriding legitimate ground to continue to Process your Personal Data. Furthermore, where we Process your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes, you have a right to object to such Processing at any time.
Should you wish to exercise any rights in connection with your Personal Data,
please email us at
dataprotection@what3words.com
. We will process any request in accordance with any local laws and our policies and procedures. We aim to respond to enquiries within 3 working days, but it may take us up to 30 days to comply with valid requests.
We have appointed the following entity as
what3words’ representative in the European Union
for data protection matters
(pursuant to Article 27 of the GDPR): Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG, Walter-Gropius-Straße 17, 80807 München, Germany.
Individuals to whom the GDPR applies may contact our representative on matters related to the processing of Personal Data – please include ‘re: what3words Limited’ in any correspondence.
In the event that you aren’t happy with our Processing of your Personal Data, we ask that you always seek to get in touch in the first instance so that we can help ease your concerns. However, you also have the right to lodge a complaint about how we Process your Personal Data with the relevant data protection authority.
7. Third party products accessed from the Website or Apps e.g. other websites
Our Website, Apps, this Policy and our
Terms and Conditions
may contain links to and from the online products of third parties. If you follow a link to any of these online products, please note they have their own privacy policies which will govern use of any Personal Data that they Process for their own purposes. Please check these policies carefully before you click on any links and/or submit any Personal Data to these online products.
8. Updates to this Policy
Any updates or changes that we may make to this Policy will be posted on this page. Where it makes sense because the changes are material, we may notify you by e-mail (to the extent permitted by applicable law to send these emails) or in another appropriate manner such as when you next interact with the Website or Apps.
9. Definitions
“
Apps
” means applications made available by us, including (but not limited to) “what3words”, “
三
词
地址
App”, “what3words BETA”, and “what3words Work”, and excluding
“what3words Lite” and the “FindMe” service;
“
compliance with legal obligations
”
refers to the lawful basis of processing personal data set out in Art. 6(1)(c) GDPR;
“
consent
” refers to the lawful basis of processing personal data set out in Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR;
“
Controller
” means the natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the Processing of Personal Data;
“
GDPR
” means Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (General Data Protection Regulation);
“
legitimate interest
” refers to the lawful basis of processing personal data set out in Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR;
“
performance of the contract
” or “
taking steps prior into entering into a contract
” refers to the lawful basis of processing personal data set out in Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR;
“
Personal Data
” means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person;
“
Process
” or
Processing
” means any operation or set of operations which is performed on Personal Data or on sets of Personal Data, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaption or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction;
“
Processor
” means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which Processes Personal Data on behalf of the Controller; and
“
Website
” means what3words.com.
Sub-policy 3
http://corp.aarki.com/privacy:
1. ABOUT US AND OUR SERVICES
Aarki LLC (
"Aarki"
,
"we"
,
"our"
or
"us"
) works
                            with mobile application developers, brands, and advertising agencies (our
"Customers"
)
                            to deliver advertising to
                            users of mobile apps. We do this through a media buying and optimization platform and
                            service that
                            we make available to our Customers (our
"Service"
).
2. WHAT THIS POLICY COVERS
2.1
We are committed to protecting and respecting the privacy of our Customers' users of our
                            Service
                            and visitors of our website at
www.aarki.com
(the
"Site"
).
2.2
This Privacy Policy sets out how we collect, store, process, transfer, share and use data
                            (
"personal information"
)
                            that identifies or is associated with visitors of our Site and users authorised to access
                            the Service by our Customers.
2.3
When we collect and use personal information in connection with our Service, we do so both
                            on the instructions of the relevant Customer,
                            in order to provide them with the Service, and for our own purposes. For instance, we use
                            information about how our Customers' users use and
                            access our Service to improve our Service.
2.4
This Privacy Policy sets out how we use your personal information through our Site, and how
                            we use it for our own purposes in
                            connection with the Service.
2.5
If you have been authorised to use our Service by a Customer your personal information will
                            also be used by the Customer in other ways. You should
                            therefore also ensure that you read the Customer's privacy notice or policy to understand
                            how your personal information may be used by the
                            relevant Customer when they use or give you access to the Service.
2.6
If you have any general questions about this Privacy Policy or how we use your personal
                            information, please contact us at
privacy@aarki.com
.
2.7
This Privacy Policy was last modified on
April 10, 2022
.
3. END USERS
If you are an end user of a mobile app that receives Customers' targeted advertising through
                            our
                            Service and would like to learn more about how we use your personal information, including
                            how to
                            opt-out of advertising from us, please see our
Advertising Privacy Policy
4. REGION-SPECIFIC DISCLOSURES
4.1
We may choose or be required by law to provide different or additional disclosures relating
                            to the processing of
                            personal information about residents of certain countries, regions or states.
4.2
If you are resident in the State of California in the United States, please refer to [
Annex 1
]
                            for additional California-specific privacy disclosures.
4.3
If you are resident in the State of Nevada in the United States, Chapter 603A of the Nevada
                            Revised Statutes permits a Nevada resident to
                            opt out of future sales of certain covered information that a website operator has collected
                            or will collect about the resident.
                            To submit such a request, please contact us at
privacy@aarki.com
.
4.4
If you are resident in the European Economic Area or the United Kingdom, please refer to [
Annex 2
]
                            for additional EEA and UK specific privacy disclosures.
5. INFORMATION WE COLLECT WHEN YOU USE OUR SITE
Personal information you provide directly to us
5.1
When you use our Site, we will collect the following information that you provide to us
                            through our contact form:
(a)
Contact information
, such as your name, email address and
                                    organization name.
(b)
Any comments or queries
that you submit through the contact form.
5.2
We use the information you provide to us to communicate with you and respond to any queries
                            that
                            you submit to us through our Site.
Personal information we collect automatically when you visit our Site
5.3
We will also collect the following information about how you access and use the Site and
                            information about
                            the device you use to access the Site:
(a)
Information about how you access and use the Site
, such as the
                                    website you came from and the website you go to when
                                    you leave the Site, the time you access the Site, how frequently you access the
                                    Site, how long you use the Site for,
                                    the approximate location that you access the Site from and other actions you take on
                                    the Site.
(b)
Information about your device that you use to access the Site
, such
                                    as the type of device, operating system, browser, your Internet service
                                    provider or mobile network and your IP address.
(a)
We use the information we collect about your device and your use of our Site to present the
                            Site
                            to you on your device in accordance with your screen and window size and your browser
                            settings.
                            We will also use this information to monitor the performance of, and improve the Site and to
                            help us develop new features of the Site.
6. INFORMATION WE COLLECT WHEN YOU USE OUR SERVICE
Personal information you provide directly to us
6.1
We collect the following personal information about you if you access and use our Service on
                            behalf of a Customer:
(a)
Contact information
, such as your name and email address.
(b)
The name of the Customer
giving you access to the Service.
(c)
Login information
, such as your email and password that you use to
                                    access the Service.
6.2
We use the information you provide to us when you access our Service to authenticate you and
                            give you access
                            to the Service, for billing and audit purposes as well as to communicate with you and send
                            you Service-related communications.
Personal information we collect automatically when you use the Service
6.3
We will also collect the following information about how you access and use the Service and
                            information about the device you use to access the Service:
(a)
Information about how you access and use the Service
, such as the
                                    time you access the Service, how
                                    frequently you access the Service, how long you use the Service for, the approximate
                                    location that
                                    you access the Service from and other actions you take on the Service.
(b)
Information about your device that you use to access the Service
,
                                    such as the type of device,
                                    operating system, browser, your Internet service provider or mobile network and your
                                    IP address.
6.4
We use the information we collect about your device and your use of our Service to grant
                            you access to the Service, and to present the Service to you on your device in accordance
                            with
                            your screen and window size and your browser settings. We will also use this information to
                            monitor the performance of, and improve the Service and to help us develop new features of
                            the Service.
7. RECIPIENTS OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
7.1
We may share the personal information we collect and use for our own purposes with the
                            following:
(a)
Companies owned by or under common ownership with Aarki
, including
                                    our subsidiaries
                                    (i.e.,any organisation we own or control) and our ultimate holding company (i.e.,
                                    any organisation that owns or controls us) and any subsidiaries it owns. These
                                    companies may use your personal information in the same way as described under this
                                    Privacy Policy.
(b)
Service providers and advisors.
We may share your personal
                                    information with third
                                    party vendors and other service providers that perform services for us or on our
                                    behalf, which may include providing mailing, email or chat services, fraud
                                    prevention, web hosting, or providing analytic services.
(c)
Purchasers and third parties in connection with a business
                                        transaction.
Your
                                    personal information may be disclosed to third parties in connection with a
                                    transaction, such as a merger, sale of assets or shares, reorganisation, financing,
                                    change of control or acquisition of all or a portion of our business.
(d)
Law enforcement, regulators and other parties for legal reasons.
We
                                    may share your
                                    personal information with third parties as required by law or if we reasonably
                                    believe that such action is necessary to: (i) comply with the law and the reasonable
                                    requests of law enforcement; (ii) detect and investigate illegal activities and
                                    breaches of agreements; and/or (iii) exercise or protect the rights, property, or
                                    personal safety of Aarki, its users or others.
7.2
We may also share your personal information with other recipients on the instructions of our
                            Customers. Please refer to the relevant Customer's privacy notice for further information
                            about how the Customer may share (or may instruct us to share) your personal information.
8. MARKETING
8.1
From time to time, we may contact you with relevant information about our and our
                            affiliates' Services. Most messages we send will be by email. For some messages, we may use
                            personal information we collect about you to help us determine the most relevant information
                            to share with you.
8.2
You can change your marketing preferences by clicking on the unsubscribe link at the bottom
                            of our emails.
9. SECURITY
We implement appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect your personal
                            information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal
                            information we collect will be stored on our secure servers. Unfortunately, however, no
                            security measures will always be completely effective. We will notify you in accordance with
                            applicable laws if we become aware that your personal information has been compromised.
10. COOKIES AND SIMILAR TECHNOLOGIES
10.1
Our Site and Service use cookies and similar technologies, such as local storage objects,
                            JavaScript tags and pixels (collectively,
"cookies"
) to distinguish you
                            from other users of our Site or Service. This helps us to improve our Site and Service,
                            provide you with certain
                            functionalities of our Site and Service.
10.2
Cookies are pieces of code that we transfer to your device's hard disk which save and store
                            certain information about your use of the Site and Service. We use them as follows:
(a)
Strictly necessary cookies.
These are cookies that are required for
                                    the operation of
                                    our Site and Service. They include, for example, cookies that enable you to log into
                                    secure areas of our Service and navigate between pages without having to re-enter
                                    information.
(b)
Analytical/performance cookies.
They allow us to recognise and
                                    count the number of
                                    visitors and to see how visitors move around our Site and Service when they are
                                    using it. This helps us to improve the way our website works, for example, by
                                    ensuring that users are finding what they are looking for easily.
(c)
Functionality cookies.
These are used to recognise you when you
                                    return to our Site
                                    or Service or provide certain functionalities of our Site and Service. This enables
                                    us to personalise our content for you and remember your preferences (for example,
                                    your choice of language or region).
10.3
Most browsers allow you to change your cookie settings, including blocking all cookies and
                            deleting existing cookies. Please note that if you choose to refuse cookies you may not be
                            able to use the full functionality of our website. These settings will typically be found in
                            the "options" or "preferences" menu of your browser. Further information about how to manage
                            cookies in most popular browsers is available through the links below:
(a)
Cookie settings in Microsoft Edge
(b)
Cookie settings in Firefox
(c)
Cookie settings in Chrome
(d)
Cookie settings in Safari
and
iOS
10.4
Deleting or blocking cookies may not be effective for all types of tracking technologies,
                            such as Local Storage Objects (LSOs) like Flash objects or HTML5.
11. INTEREST-BASED ADVERTISING
11.1
Although Aarki does not currently allow third party advertising networks to collect your
                            data for their own purposes, this is common practice among companies that operate online,
                            and in the future, we may allow certain third-party advertising networks, social media
                            companies and other third-party businesses to collect and disclose your personal
                            information, including Internet/Network information, directly from your device when you use
                            our apps or otherwise engage with us. These third parties may use your personal information
                            for purposes of analysing and optimizing our Service and advertisements on other websites or
                            mobile apps, or on other devices you may use, or to personalize content and perform other
                            advertising-related services such as reporting, attribution, analytics, and market research.
                            These third-party businesses may also use such information for their own purposes in
                            accordance with their own privacy statements, and may sell the information to third parties,
                            including other advertising networks, for advertising and other purposes.
11.2
You can opt-out of receiving some interest-based advertisements on mobile apps by visiting
http://www.aboutads.info/appchoices
.
                            You may also be able to opt-out of some — but not all —
                            interest-based advertising served by mobile ad networks by visiting
http://youradchoices.com/appchoices
and downloading the mobile AppChoices app.
11.3
Please note that when you opt out of receiving interest-based advertisements, this does not
                            mean you will no longer see advertisements from us or through our Service. It means that the
                            online ads that you do see from DAA program participants should not be based on your
                            interests. We are not responsible for the effectiveness of, or compliance with, any
                            third-parties’ opt-out options or programs or the accuracy of their statements regarding
                            their programs. In addition, third parties may still use cookies to collect information
                            about your use of online services, including for analytics and fraud prevention as well as
                            any other purpose permitted under the DAA’s principles. To learn more about interest-based
                            advertising and how you may be able to opt-out of some of this advertising, you may wish to
                            visit the Digital Advertising Alliance’s (DAA) and/or the Network Advertising Initiative’s
                            (NAI) online resources, at
www.aboutads.info/choices
or
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
.
11.4
If you are resident in the State of California in the United States, please refer to
                            [
Annex 1
] for additional information about how you can
                            opt out of this kind of data collection.
11.5
Please note that in the event Aarki elects in the future to allow third parties to collect
                            your personal
                            information for the purpose of interest based advertising, we will not collect personal
                            information for
                            the purpose of interest-based advertising about you if you are resident in the European
                            Economic Area or the United Kingdom.
12. CHANGES TO THIS POLICY
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time and so you should review this page
                            periodically.
                            When we change this Privacy Policy in a material way, we will update the "last modified"
                            date in section
                            2 of this Privacy Policy. Changes to this Privacy Policy are effective when they are posted
                            on this page.
ANNEX 1
CALIFORNIA PRIVACY DISCLOSURES
These additional California Privacy Disclosures (the
"CA Disclosures"
)
                            supplement the
                            information contained in our
Privacy Policy
and apply solely to individual
                            residents of the
                            State of California (
"consumers"
or
"you"
).
                            These CA Disclosures provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and
                            otherwise process personal information of individual residents of the State of California,
                            either online or offline, within the scope of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018
                            (
"CCPA"
). Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these CA
                            Disclosures have the same
                            meaning as defined in our
Privacy Policy
or as otherwise defined in the
                            CCPA.
                            For purposes of these CA Disclosures,
"personal information"
has the
                            meaning provided by the
                            CCPA and does not include information that is publicly available, that is deidentified or
                            aggregated such that it is not capable of being associated with us, or that is excluded from
                            the CCPA’s scope. This section does not apply to information relating to our employees,
                            contractors, and other personnel.
1. COLLECTION AND USE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
1.1
We collect personal information from and about you for a variety of purposes, as described
                            in section 5 (
Information we collect when you use our Site
) and section 6 (
Information
                            we
                            collect when you use our Service
) of the
Privacy Policy
. In the last 12
                            months, we have
                            collected the following categories of personal information:
When You Use Our Site and Service:
Identifiers
, such as your name, phone number, email address,
                                    password, country, or other similar identifiers.
Internet/Network information
, such as device information, logs and
                                    analytics data.
Geolocation data
, such as approximate location data generated based
                                    on your IP address or other information.
Professional/Employment information
, such as the business or
                                    organization you represent, your title with that business or
                                    organization and information relating to your role with the business or
                                    organization.
Other personal information
, including communication preferences,
                                    customer service and communications history, and personal
                                    information you provide us in relation to a question, request or inquiry.
1.2
We collect this information directly from you, from our business partners and affiliates,
                            from your browser or device when you visit our websites,
                            or from third parties that you permit to share information with us.
2. SOURCES OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
As described in section 5 (
Information we collect when you use our Site
) and section
                            6
                            (
Information we collect when you use our Service
) of the
Privacy
                            Policy
, we collect personal
                            information directly from you when you provide it to us, automatically when you visit our
                            websites and other online services, and from service providers and other third parties.
3. PURPOSES FOR COLLECTING PERSONAL INFORMATION
We collect personal information about you for the purposes described in section 5
                            (
Information we collect when you use our Site
) and section 6 (
Information we
                            collect when you use our Service
)
                            of the
Privacy Policy
.
4. RECIPIENTS OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
As described in section 7 (
Recipients of Personal Information
) of our
Privacy
                            Policy
, we
                            share personal information within the Aarki group of companies and with a variety of third
                            parties. For
                            representatives of our clients and other third parties, we also share your personal
                            information
                            with the entity you represent.
5. YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
5.1
As a California resident, you may be able to exercise the following rights (subject to
                            certain limitations at law):
(a)
The Right to Know
any or all of the following information relating
                                    to your personal information we
                                    have collected and disclosed in the last 12 months, upon verification of your
                                    identity:
(i)
The specific pieces of personal information we have collected
                                            about you.
(ii)
The categories of personal information we have collected about
                                            you.
(iii)
The categories of sources of the personal information.
(iv)
The categories of personal information that we have disclosed to third
                                            parties for a
                                            business purpose, and the categories of recipients to whom this information
                                            was disclosed.
(v)
The categories of personal information we have sold and the categories of
                                            third parties to
                                            whom the information was sold.
(vi)
The business or commercial purposes for collecting or selling
                                            the personal information.
(b)
The Right to Request Deletion
of personal information we have
                                    collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
(c)
The Right to Opt Out of Personal Information Sales
to third parties
                                    now or in the future.
5.2
You also have the right to be free of discrimination for exercising these rights. However,
                            please note that if the exercise
                            of these rights limits our ability to process personal information (such as in the case of a
                            deletion request), we may
                            no longer be able to provide you our products and services or engage with you in the same
                            manner.
6. HOW TO EXERCISE YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
Right to Know and Right to Deletion
6.1
You may submit a request to exercise your California Consumer Rights by emailing us at
dsar@aarki.com
.
6.2
Before processing your request, we will need to verify your identity and confirm you are a
                            resident
                            of the State of California. In order to verify your identity, we will generally either
                            require the successful
                            authentication of your membership, or the matching of sufficient information you provide us
                            to the information we
                            maintain about you in our systems. This process may require us to request additional
                            personal information from you,
                            including, but not limited to, your email, address, and phone number.
6.3
In certain circumstances, we may decline a request to exercise the rights described above,
                            particularly
                            where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems.
                            If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the
                            reasons
                            for declining to comply with the request.
Right to Opt Out of Sales of Personal Information
6.4
To opt out of data sales, please click on the link below:
Enter your device ID:
Opt-out
7. AUTHORIZED AGENTS
7.1
In certain circumstances, California residents are permitted to use an authorized agent to
                            submit requests to
                            know or delete personal information on their behalf through the designated methods set forth
                            in these CA Disclosures,
                            where we can verify the authorized agent’s authority to act on their behalf by:
(a)
receiving a power of attorney valid under the laws of California from the consumer
                                    or their authorized agent.
(b)
receiving sufficient evidence to show that the consumer has:
(i)
provided the authorized agent signed permission to act on their behalf.
(ii)
verified the consumer’s own identity directly with us pursuant to the
                                            procedures set forth in these CA Disclosures.
(iii)
directly confirmed with us that the consumer provided the authorized agent
                                            permission to submit the request on their behalf.
(c)
for requests to opt-out of personal information “sales”: receiving a signed
                                    permission demonstrating your authorized
                                    agent has been authorized by you to act on your behalf.
ANNEX 2
EUROPEAN AND UK PRIVACY DISCLOSURES
These European and UK Privacy Disclosures supplement the information contained in our
                                Privacy Policy and apply to our processing of your personal information if you are based
                                in
                                the European Economic Area (
"EEA"
) or the United Kingdom
                                (
"UK"
).
If you are in the EEA or the UK, you should ensure that you read both the Privacy Policy and
                            these additional European and UK Privacy Disclosures to understand how we use your personal
                            information and your rights in respect of that personal information.
1. WHO IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE USE OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
1.1
Aarki determines and is responsible for the uses of your personal information described in
                            the Privacy Policy and
                            these European and UK Privacy Disclosures, meaning that we will be the controller of your
                            personal information
                            when we use it in these instances.
1.2
The Customer who grants you access to the Service will also determine and is responsible for
                            how we use your personal
                            information when we do so on their instructions when providing them with the Service,
                            meaning that
                            they will be the controller of your personal information in those instances.
2. INFORMATION WE COLLECT WHEN YOU USE OUR SITE
2.1
The following table sets out the personal information we collect when you use our Site, how
                            we use it, the lawful basis we
                            rely on for processing that personal information and how long we keep it:
Category of personal information
How we use that personal information
Lawful basis for processing
Retention period
Contact information
, such as your name, email address and organisation
                                name.
We use this information to respond to any queries that you submit to us through our
                                    Site.
We use this information to send you unsolicited marketing communications in
                                accordance with your preferences.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely responding to
                                    enquiries we
                                    receive about our products and services.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you have given
                                us your consent to do so.
We will store this information for no longer than two (2) years after you last
                                contact us or, if you have
                                agreed to receive marketing communications from us, two (2) years after you opt out
                                of receiving such communications from us.
Comments and queries
that you submit to us through the contact form on
                                our Site.
We use this information to respond to the queries that you submit to us through our
                                Site.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely responding to
                                enquiries we receive about our products and services.
We will store this information for no longer than two (2) years after you last
                                contact us.
Marketing and Communications Preferences
, such as your preferences in
                                receiving
                                marketing from us.
We use this information to provide notifications, send news, alerts and marketing
                                    communications and we do this in accordance with your choices.
We use this information to ensure that we comply with our legal obligation to send
                                only those marketing
                                communications to which you have consented.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interest, namely ensuring the user
                                    receives the correct marketing
                                    and other communications in accordance with the user's preferences.
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are
                                subject.
We will store this information for no longer than two (2) years from when you opt
                                out of receiving communications from us.
Information about how you access and use the Site
, such as the website
                                you came from
                                and the website you go to when you leave the Site, the time you access the Site, how
                                frequently you access the Site, how long you use the Site for, the approximate
                                location that you access the Site from and other actions you take on the Site.
We use this information to present the Site to you on your device in accordance with
                                    your
                                    screen and window size and your browser settings.
We use this information to monitor the performance of, and improve our Site and to
                                develop new features of the Site.
The processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you, namely our
                                    website terms and conditions.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you have given
                                us your consent to do so.
This information will remain identifiable while the cookies used to receive it
                                remain on your device, namely for a period of 13
                                months from when they are installed in accordance you’re your preferences.
Information about your device that you use to access the Site
, such as
                                the type of
                                device, operating system, browser,
                                your Internet service provider or mobile network and your IP address.
We use this information to present the Site to you on your device in accordance with
                                    your screen and window size and your browser settings.
We use this information to monitor the performance of, and improve our Site and to
                                develop new features of the Site.
The processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you, namely our
                                    website terms and conditions.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you have given
                                us your consent to do so.
This information will remain identifiable while the cookies used to receive it
                                remain on your device, namely for a period of 13 months from when they are installed
                                in accordance you’re your preferences.
3. INFORMATION WE COLLECT WHEN YOU USE OUR SERVICE
3.1
The following table sets out the personal information we collect when you access and use our Service on behalf of a Customer,
                            how we use it, the lawful basis we rely on for processing that personal information and how long we keep it:
Category of personal information
How we use that personal information
Lawful basis for processing
Retention period
Contact information
, such as your name and email address and the name
                                of the Customer
                                granting you access to the Service.
We use this information to authenticate you and grant you access to the Service.
We use this information to send you Service-related communications.
We use this information to send you unsolicited marketing communications in accordance
                                with your preferences.
The processing is necessary for the Customer's legitimate interests, namely
                                    providing you with access to the Service.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely providing technical
                                    updates about our Service.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you have given us
                                your consent to do so.
We will store this information for no longer than two (2) years after you last contact
                                us or, if you have agreed to receive marketing
                                communications from us, two (2) years after you opt out of receiving such communications
                                from us.
Comments and queries
that you submit to us in connection with your use
                                of the Service.
We use this information to respond to the queries that you submit to us and provide
                                product support.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interests, namely providing customer
                                service and support.
We will store this information for no longer than two (2) years after you last contact
                                us.
Marketing and Communications Preferences
, such as your preferences in
                                receiving marketing from us.
We use this information to provide notifications, send news, alerts and marketing
                                    communications and
                                    we do this in accordance with your choices.
We use this information to ensure that we comply with our legal obligation to send only
                                those marketing
                                communications to which you have consented.
The processing is necessary for our legitimate interest, namely ensuring the user
                                    receives the correct marketing and other
                                    communications in accordance with the user's preferences.
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are
                                subject.
We will store this information for no longer than two (2) years from when you opt out of
                                receiving communications from us.
Information about how you access and use the Service
, such as the time
                                you access the Service,
                                how frequently you access the Service, how long you use the Service for,
                                the approximate location that you access the Service from and other actions you take on
                                the Service.
We use this information to present the Service to you on your device in accordance
                                    with your
                                    screen and window size and your browser settings.
We use this information to monitor the performance of, and improve our Service and to
                                develop new features of the Service.
The processing is necessary for the Customer's legitimate interests, namely
                                    providing you with access to the Service.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you have given us
                                your consent to do so.
This information will remain identifiable while the cookies used to receive it remain on
                                your device. The cookies we use to
                                obtain this information include session cookies (which are deleted after you leave the
                                Service) and persistent cookies
                                that stay on your device for 1 year.
Information about your device that you use to access the Service
, such
                                as the type of device, operating system,
                                browser, your Internet service provider or mobile network and your IP address.
We use this information to present the Service to you on your device in accordance
                                    with your screen
                                    and window size and your browser settings.
We use this information to monitor the performance of, and improve our Service and to
                                develop new features of the Service.
The processing is necessary for the Customer's legitimate interests, namely
                                    providing you with access to the Service.
We will only use your personal information in this way to the extent you have given us
                                your consent to do so.
This information will remain identifiable while the cookies used to receive it remain on
                                your device. The cookies we use to obtain
                                this information include session cookies (which are deleted after you leave the Service)
                                and persistent cookies
                                that stay on your device for 1 year.
4. Mandatory and optional Personal Information
4.1
We will notify you if the provision of certain personal information is mandatory or optional.
4.2
Where we need to collect personal information by law, to provide you with access to the Service or respond to
                            your query, and you fail to provide that personal information when requested, we may not be able to provide
                            you with access to the Service or respond to requests.
5. Cookies and similar technologies
Other than strictly necessary cookies, we will only place cookies on your device with your consent. You can let
                            us know which cookies you agree to receive, and view further information about the cookies we use, through the popup
                            displayed to you when you access the Site.
6. International Transfers of Personal Information
6.1
We may transfer personal information to our service providers and partners as described in section 7
                            (
Recipients of Personal Information
) of the Privacy Policy. This may mean that your personal information may be
                            transferred to and stored in countries outside the UK or EEA where we and our third-party service providers have operations,
                            including the United States.
6.2
These international transfers of your personal information will be made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, including:
(a)
ensuring that recipients or the country in which they are located are deemed by the European Commission or under law applicable in
                                    the UK to provide adequate protection for personal information.
(b)
ensuring that transfers are subject to standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission or the UK Information Commissioner
                                    for the transfer of personal information.
6.3
We will take appropriate steps to ensure that your personal information is treated securely and in accordance with applicable
                            law and this Privacy Policy regardless of where it is processed.
6.4
If you wish to enquire further about the safeguards we use, please contact us using the details
                            set out at the top of the Privacy Policy.
7. your rights in respect of your personal information
7.1
In accordance with applicable privacy law, you have the following
                            rights in respect of your personal information that we hold:
(a)
Right of access
. You have the right to obtain:
(i)
confirmation of whether, and where, we are processing your personal information.
(ii)
information about the categories of personal information we are processing, the purposes for which we process
                                            your personal information and information as to how we determine applicable retention periods.
(iii)
information about the categories of recipients with whom we may share your personal information.
(iv)
a copy of the personal information we hold about you.
(b)
Right of portability.
You have the right, in certain circumstances, to receive a copy of the personal information you have provided
                                    to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format that supports re-use, or to request the transfer
                                    of your personal data to another person.
(c)
Right to rectification.
You have the right to obtain rectification of any
                                    inaccurate or incomplete personal information we hold about you without undue delay.
(d)
Right to erasure.
You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to erase your personal information without undue delay
                                    if the continued processing of that personal information is not justified.
(e)
Right to restriction.
You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to limit the purposes
                                    for which we process your personal information if the continued processing of the personal information in this way
                                    is not justified, such as where the accuracy of the personal information is contested by you.
7.2
You also have the right to object to any processing based on our legitimate
                                interests where there are grounds relating to your particular situation. There may be compelling reasons for
                                continuing to process your personal information, and we will assess and inform you if that is the case.
7.3
If you wish to exercise one of these rights, please contact us using the contact details at the top of the Privacy Policy.
7.4
Please note that, in order to exercise your rights with respect to any personal information that we hold about you on behalf
                            of a Customer, we will need to ask for instructions from the relevant Customer before we take any action. We therefore
                            recommend that you contact that Customer directly if you would like to exercise your rights in respect of this personal information.
7.5
If you reside in the UK, you have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Information Commissioner's
                            Office ("ICO"), the UK regulator for data protection issues. You can make a complaint via the ICO's website
                            (
https://ico.org.uk/make-a-complaint/
).
                            This website also provides additional contact details for the ICO.
7.6
If you are resident in the EEA, you have the right to make a complaint at any time to the regulator in your jurisdiction.
                            To find out how to contact your local regulator, please visit
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/about-edpb/members_en
.
Sub-policy 4
https://www.adacado.com/privacy-policy-april-25-2018/:
NEW - Adacado Freemium Ads - Start building free ads today.
Learn more
Menu
why adacado?
advertising for everyone
what we do/FAQs
the DIY manifesto
explore
new
freemium ads
quick start
QuickImage©
blog
about us
support
product releases
careers
creative
solutions
templates
static/dynamic
creative editor
pricing
log-in
Privacy Policy April 25 2018
Privacy Policy April 25 2018
Privacy Policy
PRIVACY POLICY FOR ADACADO TECHNOLOGY
Protecting Your Privacy Is Important To Us
Adacado Technologies, Inc. (“Adacado”) provides advertising technology solutions (”Technology”), enabling media companies, advertising agencies and advertisers to deliver dynamic and interactive advertising via digital display ad units. This privacy policy (”Policy”) explains how personal information is collected, used, processed, shared and secured through the Technology on behalf of the online advertisers, publishers, business partners, and other businesses that use Adacado services (”Clients”).
In this section learn how you can change how you receive online advertisements by Adacado, followed by information regarding how Adacado uses and protects your data.
Purpose Of Adacado Technology
Adacado Technology is used by Adacado, Clients and other third parties to serve advertising on websites of Clients and other third parties. You may encounter Adacado Technology when an Adacado Client purchases or sells online advertisements on a website that you visit; and/or when an Adacado Client places an Adacado web beacon on its website, which you visit.
Adacado uses the information collected by Adacado Technology to help make the online advertisements you see to be more of interest to you. This is done for ad delivery and reporting purposes, and for other purposes described in this Policy.
Adacado makes advertisements more relevant through customization that reflects your recent browsing behavior. You can choose not to have Adacado use information based on your browsing behavior when delivering advertisements to you.
About The Use Of Cookies
Adacado Technology may automatically collect certain information through the use of cookies and web beacons. This information is used to measure the success of online advertising campaigns, and the campaigns of Adacado Clients. Specifically, Cookies correlate whether you saw an ad impression or chose to view an ad from that impression, with whether you later went to another page on the Adacado Site or on a Client’s website.
Cookies and web beacons are widely used together across the internet to record user preferences and other information to make the services you receive operate with increased capability and convenience. Cookies are used to both contain information about your browsing behavior (if you choose), and may be used to contain whether you do not wish to have advertisements delivered based on your interests.
However, while cookies are very useful, they are rudimentary. It’s important to note that each browser you use maintains its own cookies and each browser acts independently from all other browsers that you use. Adacado does not link information between your browsers. Keep in mind that (1) options you choose regarding advertisements from Adacado need be set for each browser that you use, and (2) if you have chosen not to receive interest-based advertisements, you must also delete the cookies on your browser for the Adacado domain because Adacado would not know your preference.
Adacado uses Trustpilot for customer feedback, and they have their own cookie policy which you can view
here
.
Note that if you are using an ad blocker product, you may need to temporarily enable your ad blocker to manage your preferences here.
Ways To Change How You Receive Advertisements From Adacado
We respect your rights and encourage you to exercise your rights as a consumer of online advertising. Here are some ways you can exercise your rights:
(a) Opt out of all Interest-based Advertising from Adacado
If you do not want advertising served to you to use the Adacado Technology cookie, click the button below. This operation will erase any existing data that Adacado Technology may have already gathered, and will save a setting in a cookie associated with your browser saying not to deliver interest-based advertisements.
Opt Out
Note that advertisements may still be delivered to your Web browser on behalf of companies using Adacado Technology but those advertisements may not be as relevant to you because the advertisement request will only use information that is automatically transmitted through an Internet communication and not information collected using an Adacado cookie on your computer.
(b) Explicit consent
In some jurisdictions where you receive online advertising, your explicit consent is required before personal information about you can be saved or used. Adacado Technology assures your consent wishes are respected. In those jurisdictions (eg European Union), Adacado Technology expects to receive confirmation of your explicit consent from the advertiser or from the site on which the advertisement is to be delivered (the publisher). If your explicit consent is not received, Adacado Technology will not deliver an interest-based advertisement. Requesting your consent is the responsibility of the advertiser or the publisher – please set and manage your wishes directly with them. Regardless, from consent-requiring jurisdictions, Adacado Technology will never deliver an interest-based advertisement without your explicit consent.
(c) Other requests regarding your information
Send an email detailing your request to
privacy@adacado.com
How Adacado Technology Processes Information Related To Ads You See
Using cookies and web beacons, Adacado Technologies saves information inside a cookie on a device associated with your browser. Inside the cookie is a simple, unique visitor identifier. Note that uniquely-identifying information about you such as your name, address or, email address is never used or saved.
Adacado uses this visitor identifier to associate your browsing history and information about Adacado advertisements you have seen. Browsing history is information about how you may interact with an advertiser’s website. For example, if you were interested in and viewed one or more products over time, or visited a category page describing a grouping of an advertiser’s products, Adacado would record that information. Adacado also records advertisement delivery history which is what advertisements were delivered to you, and whether and on what elements of the advertisements you clicked (e.g., clicking the advertisement’s image or button).
When Adacado Technologies receives a request to deliver an advertisement, it may use the above information to deliver an interest-based advertisement. However, if consent is not provided (for consent-requiring jurisdictions), or you have opted out of Adacado advertising, you will not be delivered an interest-based ad. In such cases you will receive a generic ad that is not based on any information related to you.
Adacado’s only connection to you is through your visitor identifier. It describes no information about you and is used solely as a link to browsing history and advertisement delivery history. By exercising your rights to your information as described in an earlier section of this document, your visitor identifier is deleted, thereby severing the link to our data and making it anonymous.
Data Adacado Collects And Uses
Adacado collects data related to your browsing activity and advertisements delivered to you through cookies or visitor id-based transactions that record:
events related to your activity on our advertising partner’s website such as the products you viewed or areas such as category pages.
events regarding your ad serving activity such as the advertisements that were displayed to you and how you interacted with them (e.g. clicks)
information related to your device such as device type, operating system, version but no personally identified information.
non-precise geo-location information that may identify you as being in a country, region or city, for example to serve only advertisements for products that are only locally available to you.
For consent-requiring jurisdictions, Adacado is GDPR and CPRA compliant and does not use or save IP addresses unless your explicit consent is provided.
The data associated with your id is stored for 13 months after which it is removed automatically.
Information Adacado Technology Does Not Collect In Its Advertisements, Cookies Or Web Beacons
Sensitive information such as political views, health, religion.
Hardware-based identifiers such as MAC address.
Anything that identifies who you are, such as your email address, your address, your name.
Data Security And Retention
Adacado processes and stores all data on Google Cloud Services based in the United States. We retain data that we collect for up to 13 months from the date of collection.
Disclosure Of Information To Third Parties
Adacado may share your data with vendors, consultants and other service providers (“Service Providers”) who are engaged by or working with Adacado in connection with the operation of the Sites or its services who need access to such information to carry out their work. In some cases, the Service Provider may be directly collecting the information from you on Adacado’s behalf. Adacado may also share personal information with other third parties when you give your consent to do so. Adacado is not responsible for the actions of Service Providers or other third parties, nor is Adacado responsible for any additional information you provide directly to these Service Providers or other third parties, and you are encouraged to become familiar with their practices before disclosing information directly to them.
Adacado may share aggregated data for purposes such as campaign improvement, reporting, and service improvement. Nothing herein restricts the sharing of aggregate information, which may be shared with third parties without your consent. Adacado may share and enhance non-personal information collected from you with third parties.
Adacado may disclose your personal information to third parties in the good faith belief that Adacado feels authorized or obligated to do so by law, or that doing so is reasonably necessary or appropriate to comply with the law or with legal process or authorities, to respond to any claims, to protect the rights, property or safety of Adacado, its users, its employees or the public, or to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected or actual prohibited activities, including but not limited to, fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
Adacado may disclose and transfer non-personal information, as part of, or during negotiations of, any merger, consolidation, sale of assets, bankruptcy, financing or acquisition or in any other situation where personal information may be transferred as one of the business assets of Adacado.
Privacy Notice For Children
Adacado is especially concerned about protecting children’s privacy. Adacado hopes that parents and teachers are involved in children’s Internet explorations. The information Adacado gathers and the products and services provided on the Adacado Site are aimed at people who are 18 years or older. When identified, all information given by a person under the age of 18 will be destroyed.
Changes In Privacy Policy
This Policy may be changed by Adacado from time to time in Adacado’s sole discretion and without any prior notice or liability to you or any other person. New versions of this Privacy Policy will be posted here and you should check it periodically for updates.
Questions Or Comments
If you have any comments or questions about this Policy or Adacado’s practices, the use or disclosure of personal information, or your personal information, please contact Adacado at:
Adacado Technologies, Inc.
Vancouver, BC, Canada
E-mail:
info@adacado.com
We use Cookies because let's face it, we're an advertising company - Cookies are what we do. By clicking Accept, you agree to the use of all Cookies.
Manage consent
Close
Privacy Overview
This website uses cookies to improve your experience while you navigate through the website. Out of these, the cookies that are categorized as necessary are stored on your browser as they are essential for the working of basic functionalities of the ...
Necessary cookies are absolutely essential for the website to function properly. These cookies ensure basic functionalities and security features of the website, anonymously.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__cfduid
1 month
The cookie is used by cdn services like CloudFare to identify individual clients behind a shared IP address and apply security settings on a per-client basis. It does not correspond to any user ID in the web application and does not store any personally identifiable information.
cookielawinfo-checbox-analytics
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Analytics".
cookielawinfo-checbox-functional
11 months
The cookie is set by GDPR cookie consent to record the user consent for the cookies in the category "Functional".
cookielawinfo-checbox-others
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Other.
cookielawinfo-checkbox-advertisement
1 year
The cookie is set by GDPR cookie consent to record the user consent for the cookies in the category "Advertisement".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-necessary
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookies is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Necessary".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-performance
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Performance".
viewed_cookie_policy
11 months
The cookie is set by the GDPR Cookie Consent plugin and is used to store whether or not user has consented to the use of cookies. It does not store any personal data.
Functional cookies help to perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collect feedbacks, and other third-party features.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__cf_bm
30 minutes
This cookie is set by CloudFare. The cookie is used to support Cloudfare Bot Management.
bcookie
2 years
This cookie is set by linkedIn. The purpose of the cookie is to enable LinkedIn functionalities on the page.
lang
session
This cookie is used to store the language preferences of a user to serve up content in that stored language the next time user visit the website.
lidc
1 day
This cookie is set by LinkedIn and used for routing.
Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors.
Cookie
Duration
Description
YSC
session
This cookies is set by Youtube and is used to track the views of embedded videos.
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc.
Cookie
Duration
Description
_ga
2 years
This cookie is installed by Google Analytics. The cookie is used to calculate visitor, session, campaign data and keep track of site usage for the site's analytics report. The cookies store information anonymously and assign a randomly generated number to identify unique visitors.
_gid
1 day
This cookie is installed by Google Analytics. The cookie is used to store information of how visitors use a website and helps in creating an analytics report of how the website is doing. The data collected including the number visitors, the source where they have come from, and the pages visted in an anonymous form.
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with relevant ads and marketing campaigns. These cookies track visitors across websites and collect information to provide customized ads.
Cookie
Duration
Description
bscookie
2 years
This cookie is a browser ID cookie set by Linked share Buttons and ad tags.
IDE
1 year 24 days
Used by Google DoubleClick and stores information about how the user uses the website and any other advertisement before visiting the website. This is used to present users with ads that are relevant to them according to the user profile.
test_cookie
15 minutes
This cookie is set by doubleclick.net. The purpose of the cookie is to determine if the user's browser supports cookies.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
5 months 27 days
This cookie is set by Youtube. Used to track the information of the embedded YouTube videos on a website.
Other uncategorized cookies are those that are being analyzed and have not been classified into a category as yet.
Cookie
Duration
Description
_gat_UA-26368737-1
1 minute
No description
adacadoVisitor
1 year
No description
adacadoVisitorValidation
1 year
No description
AnalyticsSyncHistory
1 month
No description
attribution_user_id
1 year
No description
chatlio_at--5cf989c4-f202-4a58-5dbf-5420462c6f08
session
No description
chatlio_rt--5cf989c4-f202-4a58-5dbf-5420462c6f08
session
No description
chatlio_uuid--5cf989c4-f202-4a58-5dbf-5420462c6f08
session
No description
CONSENT
16 years 8 months 22 days 7 hours 9 minutes
No description
untarget
7978 years 8 months 21 days 7 hours 2 minutes
No description
UserMatchHistory
1 month
Linkedin - Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
Sub-policy 5
https://site.adform.com/uncategorized/product-and-services-privacy-policy/:
Contact Us
For Advertisers
Adform FLOW
Your seamless media buying platform for omnichannel advertising
Demand Side Platform
Buy and manage your digital advertising with greater precision
Ad Server
Host, centralize, and track your ads across all digital channels
Data Management Platform
Centralize, organize, manage and utilize your data effectively
Identity
Unlock up to 40% incremental reach with first-party IDs
Omnichannel Activation
Integrate your digital and CTV buying with true omnichannel buying, measurement, and activation
Carbon Reduction
Run effective campaigns while reducing your carbon footprint
Retail Media
Turnkey solution for retailers covering onsite, offsite, instore and sponsored listings
For Publishers
Supply Side Platform
Monetize inventory, optimize revenue, and improve your ad sales
Publisher Ad Server
Host, manage, and organize your ad inventory
Data Management Platform for Publishers
Centralize, organize, manage, and utilizing your data effectively
Resources
Resources
Stay up to date on the latest in adtech with deep insights and thought leadership
Client Stories
Real world inspiration on strategies and tactics that deliver results
Newsroom
Stay up to date with the latest official news, press releases, and blog posts
Adtech Cafe
A series of conversations about the state of adtech enjoyed over a cup of coffee at the Adtech Café
Meet the Game Changers
Hear how our clients used Adform to change the game and improve their business results
Creative Showroom
Discover and get inspired by some of the best creative executions for digital advertising
Careers
Careers at Adform
Adform Engineers
Meet the Adformers
Why Adform
Careers
Log In
Contact Us
Introduction
What Information Do We Collect and Use
What channels does Adform operate in
With whom we share Information
How long do we store Personal Information
International Data Transfers
Your Data Protection Rights
Contact Us
Introduction
We would like to be transparent about our business and explain our technology in plain language so that users can understand how our services process personal data. This Privacy Policy describes Adform´s practices and policies with regard to the use and processing of data when providing online advertising services for the world’s largest websites and advertisers (hereinafter collectively referred to as "Services").
If you wish to find out more about Adform's processing in the context of its website and/or corporate business, please see the following
link
.
In specific Service and data processing scenarios, Adform and its clients and/or partners may act as joint controllers which – however – ultimately has no effect on exercising your data subject rights as described in the section ‘Your Data Protection Rights’ below.
If you want to find out more about the concept of joint controllership, what processing is affected and how this is managed at Adform, please visit
this link
.
What Information Do We Collect and Use
1. Reporting, measurement, forecasting, attribution
Brief explanation
Specific processing activities may be, for example:
We use combined data from cookies and the number of impressions to predict user/audience trends.
We gather IDs when a user visits an advertiser's website through tracking the user’s online activity.
For more information, please read here.
Data Categories
1st Party IDs, Cookie IDs, and technical data related to these IDs (e.g. impressions, clicks, conversions, approximate geolocation, timestamp, URL, device information, browser information), IP address.
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy Side, Sell Side, DMP.
Legal bases
We process this data by default on the basis of our legitimate interest. However, the publisher on whose site we are integrated with our product or service can decide to obtain your consent. In this case, we process the data based on your consent.
2. Improve online advertising experience and efficiency (IAB Purpose 2, Purpose 10)
Brief explanation
The ads you see on the website or app are chosen based on the basic information mentioned. This means that we may use the site you're on, the kind of device you're using, and your general location. We might also look at what you're interested in or what you've looked at before based on your interactions with the website or app to make sure you don't see the same ad too many times. We may also use it to show ads in a certain order, show ads you might like, or figure out the best time to show an ad or to make our ads work better and to make your online experience better by improving our products and services.
Data Categories
Same as in No.1.
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy side, Ad server.
Legal bases
We process this data by default on the basis of our legitimate interest. However, the publisher on whose site we are integrated with our product or service can decide to obtain your consent. In this case, we process the data based on your consent.
3. Fraud prevention and security (IAB Special Purpose 1)
Brief explanation
Your personal data can be used to monitor for and prevent unusual and possibly fraudulent or unlawful activity (e. g. to ensure that the ads are clicked upon by real people, and not bots), and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely.
Data categories
Online identifier (e. g. cookie ID, mobile advertising ID), browser information (e. g. URL/domain; time stamp, user agent, IP address).
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy side, sell side, Ad server.
Legal bases
Legitimate Interests.
4. Develop and Improve products (IAB Purpose 10)
Brief explanation
Personal data about how you use Adform clients' websites or apps, like how you engage with ads or content, can be really valuable for improving Adform products and services and creating new ones based on users’ activity online.
Data Categories
1st Party IDs, Cookies IDs and other identifiers as applicable, as well as real-time data (e. g. information about the page content, app type).
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy Side, Sell Side, Ad server, DMP.
Legal bases
We process this data by default on the basis of our legitimate interest. However, the publisher on whose site we are integrated with our product or service can decide to obtain your consent. In this case, we process the data based on your consent.
5. Synchronize our Service with other online advertising services (Link different End User devices) (IAB Feature 2)
Brief explanation
We might use Cookie IDs and other IDs to connect our Service with other online advertising services. This is an essential part of the digital advertising world because it helps our clients combine data from different advertising service providers. No other personal data is used for this purpose.
Data Categories
1st Party IDs, Cookies IDs and other identifiers as applicable.
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy Side, Sell Side, Ad server, DMP.
Legal bases
We process this data by default on the basis of our legitimate interest. However, the publisher on whose site we are integrated with our product or service can decide to obtain your consent. In this case, we process the data based on your consent.
6. Comply with legal obligations, especially processing data subjects‘ requests
Brief explanation
We may process your personal data to comply with our legal obligations, in particular to ensure that the data subject requests received from you are dealt in a lawful and suitable manner according to the deadlines established in the applicable data protection laws.
Data Categories
1st Party IDs, Cookies IDs and other identifiers as applicable.
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy Side, Sell Side, Ad server, DMP.
Legal bases
Legal obligation, legitimate interest.
7. Creation of an End User personalized advertising profile (IAB Purpose 3)
Brief explanation
We collect information about your actions on our clients' websites or apps, like the content you view or data we receive from our clients. This data may be combined with your previous actions or those of similar users. It helps us create or enhance a profile about you, including your potential interests and personal characteristics. This profile can be used to show you more relevant ads based on your interests.
Data categories
1st Party IDs, Cookie IDs, and technical data related to these IDs (e.g. impressions, clicks, conversions, approximate geolocation, timestamp, URL, device information, browser information), IP address.
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy side, sell side, Ad serving
Legal bases
Consent
8. Selection of personalized and/or contextual advertisements (IAB Purpose 4)
Brief explanation
Ads you see on our clients' websites or apps are determined by your advertising profiles, which are shaped by your activity on these platforms, as well as other websites or apps, your interests, and personal information.
Data categories
1st Party IDs, Cookie IDs, and technical data related to these IDs (e.g. impressions, clicks, conversions, approximate geolocation, timestamp, URL, device information, browser information), IP address.
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy side, ad serving.
Legal bases
Consent.
9. Use limited data to select advertising (IAB Purpose 2, Special Purpose 2)
Brief explanation
Ads on our clients' websites and apps may be tailored based on limited data, such as the site or app you're using, your general location, device type, and your interaction with content. This customization helps limit the frequency of ad displays.
Data categories
1st Party IDs, Cookie IDs, and technical data related to these IDs (e.g. impressions, clicks, conversions, approximate geolocation, timestamp, URL, device information, browser information), IP address.
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy side, sell side, ad serving.
Legal bases
Legitimate interests.
10. Save and communicate privacy choices User choices
Brief explanation
In order for Adform to respect user’s choices, it has to first know what those choices are. The storing and communicating of user choice signals (for instance in the form of TCF Strings), ensure that the choices of users can be respected and that Users do not have to make those choices again on each subsequent use of the relevant digital property.
This results in Adform’s recording of (and gaining of access to) consent signals, objections and user preference, for instance by means of TC Strings within the framework of the Transparency and Consent Framework (TCF). The user choice signals therefore represent the giving, refusing or withdrawing of consent by users and the exercise of their right to object.
Data Categories
General metadata about the website operator that indicate its implementation with the TCF, this include points such as ID of the CMP, the language, the user’s consent per purpose.
Related Adform Product and/or Service
Buy Side, Sell Side, DMP.
Legal bases
We process this data by default on the basis of our legitimate interest.
What channels does Adform operate in
1. Video channel
Description:
Video ads placed on phones, TVs, computers, gaming consoles, digital out of home signs and more.
Personal data categories:
1st Party IDs; Cookie IDs and other identifiers as applicable (e.g. MAIDs, IDFAs); IP address; Device type; Device location data (where available).
Legal basis of data processing:
Please refer to the section ‘What Information Do We Collect and Use’ for more information on exact lawful basis for each purpose.
Opt-out:
You may request to opt-out via the following link
here
.
2. Audio channel
Description:
Programmatic Audio runs on a range of services including Podcasts, Streaming Services and Digital Radio.
Personal data categories:
1st Party IDs; Cookies IDs and other identifiers as applicable (e.g. MAIDs, IDFAs); IP address; Device type; Device location data (where available).
Legal basis of data processing:
Please refer to the section ‘What Information Do We Collect and Use’ for more information on exact lawful basis for each purpose.
Opt-out:
You may request to opt-out via the following link
here
.
3. Gaming channel
Description:
In-game Advertising covers a range of gaming types from E-sport, Streaming and Platform games. The ad placements appear as game interruptions, outside of gaming area or in places which replicate advertising in real-world situations, such as advertising boards, product placements, mobile or static billboards.
Personal data categories:
1st Party IDs; Cookies IDs and other identifiers as applicable (e.g. MAIDs, IDFAs); IP address; Device type; Device location data (where available).
Legal basis of data processing:
Please refer to the section ‘What Information Do We Collect and Use’ for more information on exact lawful basis for each purpose.
Opt-out:
You may request to opt-out via the following link
here
.
4. DOOH channel
Description:
Digital Out Of Home (DOOH) refers to ads reaching the consumer while they are outside of their home, and targets people in transit, in public spaces, or during specific activities.
Personal data categories:
none.
Legal basis of data processing:
Legitimate interest.
Opt-out:
N/A.
5. CTV channel
Description:
Connected TV (CTV) refers to an internet-connected TV with built-in internet app capabilities.
Personal data categories:
1st Party IDs; Cookies IDs and other identifiers as applicable (e.g. MAIDs, IDFAs); IP address; Device type; Device location data (where available).
Legal basis of data processing:
Please refer to the section ‘What Information Do We Collect and Use’ for more information on exact lawful basis for each purpose.
Opt-out:
You may request to opt-out via the following link
here
.
6. Native ads channel
Description:
Native ads seamlessly match the content and design of the content it appears with. Native ads can be found in gaming, news, social media or other web or apps content outlets.
Personal data categories:
1st Party IDs; Cookies IDs and other identifiers as applicable (e.g. MAIDs, IDFAs); IP address; Device type; Device location data (where available).
Legal basis of data processing:
Please refer to the section ‘What Information Do We Collect and Use’ for more information on exact lawful basis for each purpose.
Opt-out:
You may request to opt-out via the following link
here
.
7. Display channel
Description:
Non-video, non-native banners that can be seen when browsing websites or using apps.
Personal data categories:
1st Party IDs; Cookies IDs and other identifiers as applicable (e.g. MAIDs, IDFAs); IP address; Device type; Device location data (where available).
Legal basis of data processing:
Please refer to the section ‘What Information Do We Collect and Use’ for more information on exact lawful basis for each purpose.
Opt-out:
You may request to opt-out via the following link
here
.
With whom we share Information
With clients
The Services allow clients to provide and share Information with each other. Clients have access to the Information they collect, upload or use within the Services, and may have access to Information generated through their use of the Service.
With third parties
We may share Cookie IDs or other IDs with partners for the purpose of ID synchronization. A list of such partners is available
here
.
We may also share Information with our affiliates and third-party services providers (list of Adform affiliates and third-party service providers (if applicable) is available
here
; who provide data processing services to us and support us in providing our Service (for example, to support the delivery of, provide functionality on, or help to enhance the security of our Service), or who otherwise process Information for purposes that are described in this Privacy Policy.
If instructed by our clients, we may also share Information that is controlled by our clients and which we process on behalf of our clients with third parties.
Also, we may disclose Information to the following categories of recipients:
To any competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, court or other third party where we believe disclosure is necessary (i) as a matter of applicable law or regulation, (ii) to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights, or (iii) to protect your vital interests or those of any other person;
To any other person with your consent or with another suitable legal basis to the disclosure.
How long do we store Personal Information
We retain personal information we collect from you as long as we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (for example, to provide our clients with a service or to comply with applicable legal, tax or accounting requirements).
In the context of information derived from tracking technologies please note:
The cookies Adform sets in browsers expire 60 days after the last interaction with the website.
Mobile Advertising IDs are technical IDs in mobile application environments. Mobile Advertising IDs are resettable by the user; however, Adform does not have control of a Mobile Advertising ID. Adform will see the same Mobile Advertising ID as long as it is not changed by the device user or updated by the device.
Adform does not keep any Cookie-based Information longer than 13 months. In other words, any data that can be related to your internet devices are deleted after maximum 13 months.
International Data Transfers
Personal Information may be transferred to and processed in countries outside of the European Union. These countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country and, in some cases, may not be as protective.
Some of the recipients of Personal Information may operate outside the European Union (e.g. in the United States of America). This means that when we transfer your Personal Information to these third parties, your Personal Information will be processed outside the European Union. We have taken appropriate safeguards to ensure an adequate level of data protection in accordance with this Privacy Policy on the side of the recipients. For example, some of the transfers may occur to the so-called ‘adequate’ countries that ensure the same level of protection of Personal Information. Nevertheless, in case the data transfer occurs to a country that is not considered ‘adequate’, we have signed Standard Contractual Clauses as an international data transfer mechanism and conducted necessary supplementary measures, such as transfer risk assessments to ensure that the level of protection of your Personal Information is not lower than in the EU.
Your Data Protection Rights
You have the following data protection rights:
You can:
access,
correct,
update or
request deletion of,
object to processing of your personal information,
ask us to restrict processing of your personal information,
request portability of your personal information or
if we process your data with your consent, withdraw your consent at any time. The withdrawal of consent will not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
You can exercise these rights at any time by visiting the Data Subject Rights section via this
link
. You may also send an email to dpo[at]adform.com.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal information. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority. A list of the European data protection authorities can be found here:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/about-edpb/members_en
Contact Us
Controller for the processing of your personal data (alone or jointly with others) is:
Adform A/S
Silkegade 3B, ST. & 1., 1113 Copenhagen, Denmark
Adform has appointed a Data Protection Officer. If you have any questions or believe your personal information has been used in a way that is not consistent with this policy or applicable legislation, or you have any other data protection related issues or queries, please contact our Data Protection Officer by e-mail sent to dpo[at]adform.com.
Written inquiries may be addressed to:
Data Protection Officer
Adform A/S
Silkegade 3B, ST. & 1., 1113 Copenhagen, Denmark
Effective date of the recent update of this Privacy Policy 05.01.2024
Your Privacy
Your Privacy
We process your data to deliver content or advertisements and measure the delivery of such content or advertisements to extract insights about our website. We share this information with our partners on the basis of consent and legitimate interest. You may exercise your right to consent or object to a legitimate interest, based on a specific purpose below or at a partner level in the link under each purpose. These choices will be signaled to our vendors participating in the Transparency and Consent Framework.
Website Privacy Page
List of IAB Vendors‎
Essential Cookies
Always Active
Essential Cookies
These cookies are essential for enabling user movement around our website and providing access to features such as your profile and purchases (if any), log-in only available material, and other secure areas of the website. These cookies do not gather information about you that could be used for marketing purposes and do not remember where you have been on the internet. This category of cookies cannot be disabled.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Analytics Cookies
Analytics Cookies
We use cookies for marketing purposes where we use our own cookies, and cookies as reflected below to collect information about how visitors use our website. These cookies collect information in the aggregate to give us insight into how our website is being used. We anonymize IP addresses, and the anonymized data is transmitted to and stored by ourself on our European servers, and on servers in the EU in respect of Facebook and Google. We, Facebook and Google may also transfer this information to third parties where required to do so by law, or where such third parties process the information on those website’s behalf.
Cookies Details‎
Social Media Cookies
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are set by a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit.    If you do not allow these cookies you may not be able to use or see these sharing tools.
Cookies Details‎
Marketing Cookies
Marketing Cookies
We use cookies for marketing purposes where we use our own cookies, and cookies from third party as reflected below to collect information about how visitors use our website.
You can see a list of all cookies here, where we also describe the lifetime of each cookies: https://site.adform.com/privacy-center/adform-cookies/
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
IAB Purposes Category
IAB Purposes Category
Technically deliver ads or content
Always Active
Your device can receive and send information that allows you to see and interact with ads and content.
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug
Always Active
Your data can be used to monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity, and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely.
Match and combine offline data sources
Always Active
Data from offline data sources can be combined with your online activity in support of one or more purposes
Link different devices
Always Active
Different devices can be determined as belonging to you or your household in support of one or more of purposes.
Receive and use automatically-sent device characteristics for identification
Always Active
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP address or browser type.
Store and/or access information on a device
Targeting Cookies
Cookies, device identifiers, or other information can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes presented to you.
Select basic ads
Targeting Cookies
Ads can be shown to you based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your approximate location, or your device type.
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Create a personalised ads profile
Targeting Cookies
A profile can be built about you and your interests to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you.
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Select personalised ads
Targeting Cookies
Personalised ads can be shown to you based on a profile about you.
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Create a personalised content profile
Targeting Cookies
A profile can be built about you and your interests to show you personalised content that is relevant to you.
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Select personalised content
Targeting Cookies
Personalised content can be shown to you based on a profile about you.
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Measure ad performance
Targeting Cookies
The performance and effectiveness of ads that you see or interact with can be measured.
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Measure content performance
Targeting Cookies
The performance and effectiveness of content that you see or interact with can be measured.
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Apply market research to generate audience insights
Targeting Cookies
Market research can be used to learn more about the audiences who visit sites/apps and view ads.
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Develop and improve products
Targeting Cookies
Your data can be used to improve existing systems and software, and to develop new products
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Full Legal Text
Opens in a new Tab
Back Button
Advertising Cookies
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
Select All Vendors
Select All Vendors
Select All Hosts
Select All
Name
cookie name
Clear Filters
Information storage and access
Apply
Confirm My Choices
Reject All
Allow All
We Care About Your Privacy
Adform and our partners store and/or access information on a device, such as unique IDs in cookies to process personal data. Adform does not place any cookies, which require your consent, before you have given a consent. You may accept,  manage your choices and/or withdraw your consent by clicking our Cookie Policy and follow the steps herein. These choices will be signaled to our partners and will not affect browsing data.
Click here to learn about our Cookie Policy
and
click here to directly withdraw your consent
We and our partners:
Store and/or access information on a device. Select basic ads. Create a personalised ads profile. Select personalised ads. Create a personalised content profile. Select personalised content. Measure ad performance. Measure content performance. Apply market research to generate audience insights. Develop and improve products.
Click here to learn about our Partners
No thanks, only use essential cookies
Yes please, I accept all cookies
Cookie Settings
Sub-policy 6
https://www.adikteev.com/eu/privacy/:
This website stores cookies on your computer. These cookies are used to collect information about how you interact with our website and allow us to remember you. We use this information in order to improve and customize your browsing experience and for analytics and metrics about our visitors both on this website and other media. To find out more about the cookies we use, see our Privacy Policy
If you decline, your information won’t be tracked when you visit this website. A single cookie will be used in your browser to remember your preference not to be tracked.
Accept
Decline
Error 404
Oups, page introuvable .
Retour à l'accueil
Contactez-nous